45 shipped.  I'm in Raleigh 
His banter with Mustang is also pretty cool, though. 
Ha, I posted those on Friday. 
what are you gonna be using it for?
"See it happening" I sea what you did there ;)
Smash Bros? 
Putin: "OMG!!! It WAS me!"
2 or 3 good friends are better than 1,000 "sorta" friends. Also, teenage boys will lie through any necessary orifice and swear against any holy or unholy thing to get with you. Actions speak louder than words though. So don't listen to what they say, watch how they act.
What kind of facility are you looking for?
I think I heard he's going back to roh
Capitalist mechanism doesn't factor pollution, for example. There is a certain lack of "morality" in it. And in many ways it's a good thing, since commerce must flow. But in some arenas where it steps on human rights or pollutes Earth it "can't be trusted".   AI might be one of these areas where such model isn't very safe for everyone.
I think some people just get their mind stuck on the ideal "zero waste" expression and don't go beyond the terminology. Zero waste is really more of a target and some people get so awesomely close. Yes the girl in the post isn't EXACTLY zero waste, yes she still produces a tiny amount of trash, yes she still probably uses [unbleached recycled-paper] toilet paper (I can't blame her!). But surely a 1 gallon trash filled in a year is damn negligible compared to a 13 gallon trash filled every week!   Also, I think it can be a bit tough to put one's head around the idea of reducing waste(i.e. avoiding useless packaging or avoiding to buy stuff that can't be recycled/composted or re-used). It sounds like a very simple and basic idea (in particular for a subreddit like this one) but we're just so deep into consumerism practices that we don't realize to what extent it's a problem. I've been casually recycling for years without putting too much thoughts into it. I read the zero waste book from Bea Johnson last year and it honestly took me a while to really be aware of all the useless stuff that I buy or all the trash that I produce. I'm no where what she does but such an interesting read and eye opener and every bit helps.
You've got to.  Each of these companies is fantastic.  Cloud Pusher Labs is incredibly good, as is Velvet Cloud.  Captivape has some pretty good flavors, but The Good Shit has been the only one that I've found that really clicks with my tastes.
For sure.  For the options in weird orders, I had those set to "random order", so as to avoid things like a bias towards whichever is listed first etc.  And I'll definitely share the data when I'm done.
I would suggest running [[Hunter's Guile]].  With all of the removal and burn in the meta now, this will help keep your beaters alive.  Also makes for some combat tricks.
Canes are just padding their stats at this point
Sent!
1. /u/h0m3g33  2. My 15 CSGO case keys for 27$ PP  3. http://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/comments/2xibwh/h_2850_paypal_w_15_csgo_case_key/cp0c6ka
I know. I'd see an ad right around the same time every year and I'd have the same response, something along the lines of "oh shit, they're going AGAIN?"
I agree with you, in this case there is an explanation and I'm not trying to excuse the boss' actions completely because as you and OP mentioned, he didn't listen. However I feel it's one of those, six of one, half a dozen of the other... Boss got angry cause of OP being late which is justified. Not listening is a dick move BUT he probable was pretty pissed.  Once again, not justifying, just playing devils advocate.
5ml Sel Marin for sure.
Both Valve and Ubisoft are to blame here, Uplay for not providing a working service and Valve for not properly working out their retailing problems.
so·cial·ist  ˈsōSHələst/  noun  1.  a person who advocates or practices socialism.  synonyms:left-wing, progressive, leftist, labor,anti-corporate, antiglobalization;More  **Source: Searching "define socialism" on Google**
VALLADIAN!  THE FEELS!  STOP IT!
Wonder what the artist would name it? 
I imagine a 20-foot long car, the engine chugging.  Mission: can't find my glasses  Mission: yes, I do need help out to my car  Mission: church bingo  Mission: spoilin' the grandkids
Nope. Doesn't justify it. It explains it.
I should have mentioned "...and does not require a monthly subscription."
No, that was pretty good. You definitely have potential, hope to see more from you
Awesome, I love the Toyobaru. Are you happy with how fast (or rather, not fast) it is? Everyone complains about it only having 200hp
The reason why piglet couldn't call for a remake was because he didn't realize it till they saw someone from the enemy team.  Once you see someone from the enemy team then u cant restart. 
i'd restructure it so any gender won't have expectations of how they should look.
I think you come off charming actually. You seem laid back but also you have drive and you're intelligent. A bit nerdy but in a charming way. No real edits, just add more photos of you. You also seem mature for your age but light hearted.  Oh and I have a bad ass recipe for sliced lamb burgers with whipped feta and caramelized onions if you want it!
It won't load for me, what is it?
I don't believe there's an explicit rule regarding yelling during attacks. I've seen people yell when they miss touches without consequence. At worst, the director's having a bad day and yellow cards you. At best, it gets you a touch you wouldn't normally get. It's something to think about trying at least. 
Sarbanes Oxley Act. 
No shit, Sherlock.
BassStarfish331 titan
Thanks folks. Now anyone got one for San Antonio/Dallas?
[M] Welcome! Don't attack Sardinia or Milan and we're all good :P
A former head of Israel’s foreign intelligence service Mossad is urging voters to oust Binyamin Netanyahu in the next general election, accusing the prime minister of endangering the country’s security with his stance on the Iranian nuclear programme.
Thank you! :D
Is there such a law? I'm sure it's not constitutional... 
Because irelia got nerfed inderectly a lot of time, like triforce nerfed... That is why they said it.
&gt; Yes, Stories of Roy Orbison in Cling-Film is a real site.  Thanks for the nostalgia. I kiss you!  &gt; Spock-Tyrion fanfic, however, is not.  You understand the Internet regards statements like these as a challenge, correct?
Just block them, it takes less than a second
 [END or further interaction?]
&gt; "Oh no"  :(
This guy knows what's up
no worries, ive had 1 girlfriend, only as a technicality, and have only really been in flirtationships. Nofap has gave me the courage and it will give to you the same...if you put the work in. you just have to have some willpower to make it, or go into the snow and freexe if you have to, just dont fail, youll regret it. i thought after i failed, if i believed hard enough, ill restart 30 seconds before. i realized willpower is key, prevent the urge before it happens
the way that the game rounds down % (which makes no logical sense as the lower your % the higher your ranking is...) so that if you had 5.98% on your reward screen it would show you 5%...i'm guessing since you're sub 1% of total elites it rounds it down to 0%. just a guess.
Got the camera on two alts, neither of them level 100, and neither of them has got the upgrade yet.
that would be great, essentially the idea of moving down in height in a standing setup is broken in all games, since it's basically a camera hack the game has no idea you are actually crouching, so you still take damage crouching behind cover because the game doesn't think you are actually that far down below.  For now the only solution to Real life crouching is to disable the player height camera hack and just make key presses.  A really cool thing is peaking around walls in dishonored, the game doesn't actually think you are looking around walls, so you get a big tactical edge, try it out sometime.
Putin is a dictator under the facade of "president".
Removed - rule 4.
I would let your parents know what happened and let them have a chat with him if they think they should. I am sure that it is normal for a 13yo to stare at boobs if he found them in his back garden.... unless it is something you do all the time it was probably weird and confusing for him. 
Seriously. Finding out shit like that is how you understand and prevent it in the future.
I agree, and this is a reason to be careful not to take "Tropes versus Women in Games" too far. It's not intended as a scholarly deconstruction of specific characters as characters. It works best when it's an example of various ways tropes are used in the writing of female characters.  (I won't argue that Ms. Sarkeesian is always right about how far she takes her arguments.)
Getting kicked out of high school doesn't ruin your life. In high school I got expelled 3x. My life is actually pretty good.
KZR you are here too!
[**POF - Free Online Dating**](http://www.windowsphone.com/s?appid=bed8c8f8-3632-4191-94d4-9145a7d70526) by Plentyoffish Media Inc. ★★★★☆ (Free)  ------  [^Report ^bug/give ^feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FWPBot) ^| ^Bot ^by ^/[u/noggin182](/user/noggin182) 
Hah. I still do. I'm doing reverse planks on my couch as I type this. 
Spent 3 runs trying this. Died every time on Formula. Forever skyfalls always knocks him under 50%. Can't seem to help it.  Make 2 combos, skyfall into 15.
Mink oil should not be used on dress shoes unless you want to ruin their shine.
I like this, therefore, I like you. Thank you friend!
No kidding.
I'm super-sneaky-fire-breathing-dragon cool
Fucking amazing.
What fucking confidentiality law? She's not this girls nurse or doctor or anything else. 
Whilst I agree that having an Federation-alligned player faction is required (as there doesn't seem to be any organised Fed PvP group to counteract EIC), I don't think it should be called the Federal Navy, as it already exists as an NPC faction.
He also could have easily declared himself "King", as many of his subordinates wanted, but choose not to.  In addition he resigned voluntarily which was extremely rare for leaders up to that point in history.  He set the tone for all future Presidents.
You're not the only person. Juggernaut gave more health (until mid/lategame), cdr, and tenacity, all very important for tanks. To get the same stats back now we have to build an additional 1-2 items. In return, we get a tiny bit more hp, (unless you're stacking hp and ignoring defensive stats / dmg) later, when we don't need it as much, and a really junky sunfire effect that has to ramp up for x amount of time before it's better than the current sunfire.
Dank ass miata's, it's kinda like the rallying call for enthusiasts 
This submission has been automatically removed because it is one paragraph long or shorter.   Your thread may need more detail or breaks our rules for being too specific (such as "which of these two games should I buy?") or too general (such as "what is the best PC game"). If your thread was asking for suggestions about what games to get, /r/gamingsuggestions, /r/ShouldIbuythisgame, or /r/askgames would be better places to ask.  If you think that your post was unjustly removed, please send us a [message](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FGames)."   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FGames) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I like Bastion and First Light. It's ridiculous that maps like Asylum -- way too small for control -- get played repeatedly and 2 of the only 3 sniper-friendly maps in the whole game (Skyshock being the other, I'm on X1 so idk about Exodus Blue) get exiled completely from Crucible
Topic: why I want to work at the hospital 
Damn fine build. Love the little details on the engine, really helps the realism.
Prison architect is good too
Ticket to Ride is not a Playdek game, but it is great.
Pdw Crusher. I'm fucked.
I thought they were 'anti-Americanization' now.
How tall are you and your dress size? These are legitimate questions. each princess has a specific quota. Like M&amp;G Ariel has to be at least 5'6'' and dress size 2.
F
*Once Daireann got a long enough grass rope going on she picked up a bit of fruit before tying it to the end. Shifting in her place Daireann glanced back at Corr for a moment before lying down on her belly only her head hanging off the edge now. With the rope in her hand she started to let it down the cliff trying to see if Grimm ate fruit or not.* 
And... looks like it was limited quantity/time.  The price is back at $40, now.  Sorry guys  :(
Going for the new COD. So Oper8tor.
[Shy Ronnie](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6_W_xLWtNa0#t=65)
Mine works well. It's ugly as all hell, but it works. It took me about a month to figure out the best design for the Duna mission. My early designs were like 50 tons, and that's wayyyyy too much. 
why buy melee when you already have the better game #64masterrace
NFNC!!!
Please use github to create issues for your this features. But i will not implement it in the next days. I have played only 8 h since the update :-)
They can take their big jump race and go back to trackmania where it came from!
For everybody else's reference, this occurs in the final scene on top of the clocktower.  &gt;*Majora*: A puppet that can no longer be used is mere garbage.  This puppet's role has just ended... &gt; &gt;*Tatl*: It can't be!  Then that moon? &gt; &gt;*Majora*: I...I shall consume.  Consume...Consume everything.  From my view, this could mean several things ranging from:  "Then that moon can't be stopped by the Giants?"  "Then that moon is a magical construct?"  "Then that moon is going to become your new puppet?"  Or something with equal meaning.  There's no symbolism involved, I think.  &gt;like was the mask the moon or was the moon created by the mask?  The latter.
For simplicity, I'd group any checker in with goons, goons just happen to fight a lot, but they're usually checkers.
Oh man do I see this so much. It's a big part of why I questioned why weed would be sooo bad in their minds. I don't see the logic.
Solution verified
chaox was benched for a reason while niq was in the hospital not even close to the same situation 
[Brush brushie brush](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PwMkfGbmfhI)
He is going super saiyan 
What buttons said. Yesterday was awesome!
+rep good seller, confirmed deal thanks man 
Fear of missing out, as lifeboatz said. People think the price will go up/down rapidly, so they buy/sell as appropriate, causing the price to go up/down even faster.  Basically, when the price makes a consistent and fast movement, people go along with it and amplify it.
Nope, the app for browsing videos (your own and published stuff) has always been Upload. Upload Studio has always been the app for editing stuff then publishing. The ability to deal with screenshots in each app is what changed recently, plus Upload Studio got a lot more power.
If it's any thing like my mind it will ignore everything it's given as input and will output complete non sense.
Indeed. Now I can continue unlocking Stewie and Carter.
Yeah! He was actually my first champion way back in season 2. I am about to get in a ranked game, so I have to make this quick. Your ult is really good for clearing waves and stealing baron/dragon, you probably know that. Use your w to set up ganks as it can be used to knock enemies towards you. You can layer this with your e to make some decent chain cc. If you are against a pokey laner, you can use your q to farm fairly reliably. You should use spells to clutch take down turrets as it makes your passive come up faster. That's all I can really say for now, but good luck! Message me if you want any more help.
It's great that they are different elements though, so you have a legitimate reason to level up both of them. Personally, I would do VoC first because I prefer scouts and the full auto perk makes it a beast. I often use my VoC as my primary even over some 302+ options.
I think a lot of people miss the message of what Jesus was conveying when He was on earth. It's not about sinning and not sinning, it's not about acts of righteousness but it's about loving each other and loving God.  When I read through some of the new testament it shows countless times Jesus trying to get it into our thick skulls that message, but all people cared about was how to get to heaven, or who's sinning more than others, or that the Messiah should be overthrowing the oppressive governments at the time.  My identity as transgender has challenged my faith and shook it a bit, especially as I think about the possibility that my very existence is a sin, but that doesn't make too much sense.  I used to go to an awesome church which focused on worship, but now I've been looking around for LGBT-friendly ones. So far no luck, some churches I just don't like. Maybe I'll go back to my original church and talk to my pastor about it.  Fortunately I haven't had any negative experiences with other Christians yet, but the possibility scares me because it would challenge my faith. It kinda stops me from going to church and the attitude to keep certain people out of church doesn't seem very Christian.  Think about when Jesus had dinner with those scummy people (people considered scum within their culture like tax collectors and other general sinners). People questioned why Jesus would do that and He said "It's not the healthy who need a doctor, but the sick."
Looks great
Isn't being high while driving a DUI? If you're pulled over I mean.   I feel like this should be mentioned.
Also any Republican with a daughter.
I'd like to add to this.  If you have any secondary priority, it should be your fellow medics.   As a medic trying to heal the Mega, I'm often targeted and immobilized, then I see my fellow medics just go right past me focusing on Mega.   Wounded/downed Medics will fail a match as fast as a downed Mega.
Exactly. Gymnastics is not a risk-free sport, but the risks go down considerably with proper supervision. Any gymnastics facility that does not have proper supervision is not a safe facility. And you point out exactly all the other concerns I would have as a gymnast. If supervision isn't adequate, I don't have good assurance that the equipment I'm using is being properly maintained or that the coach spotting me (or my child) knows what they are doing. 
Some are uneducated. Some are desperate to try anything to get healthier. Some believe in what they want to believe. Even at 1% of the population, that's more than 10 million people
It is *remarkably* comfortable. Like wearing nothing at all...
This is extremely common. These articles of "Why japan is a horrible place" has been written over at kotaku for almost half a decade. They have a very long standing axe to grind with japanese culture and sub culture.  It nothing new. This is why for some who never reads game media, I especially avoided kotaku. Even before all the drama. This is why Shitaku was considered Shitaku before all the hatred towards game media.
College dropout.
This is also because Torque is a vector while Joules are scalars. Joules are the dot product of a vector force and a vector distance. Torque is the cross product.
Ya I completely mained him in the first few weeks of of season 5 with a 72% win rate. Only played him twice after update and won both games in ranked. He isn't an early game carry but wow his KIT is godlike if you can insec some kids
SPNK in Cortana
You've never heard of the black market? It's got nothing to do with anyone's race or nationality.
Shadow is a blast in Ashran. DEATH! 
they are ripped !!!
Things I do:  * Play an instrument (I play guitar, and have been playing in bands for the last 6 years)  * Play video games, often with friends/housemates. RPGs, Hack n Slash or RTS games tend to work best because they require a lot of focus on the game-world and you can easily lose yourself in them. Games like Disgaea, Dynasty/Samurai Warriors/Warriors Orochi, Final Fantasy/Grandia/Dark Cloud, Command &amp; Conquer, Total War, Metal Gear etc. all work well, for me :)  * Watching movies - I love films, from comedies to horror to action to sci-fi. Movies are great for being immersed into an alternate world for a couple hours.  * Reading books, There are some great Thrillers out there, or action books or pop-science... or anything. It's all very interesting. Plus, some people will think you're smarter if you read books :P  * Coding. I've only just started recently learning MatLab (I wouldn't recommend starting with that language, though). You'd be surprised how much fun it can be. Kahn Academy has a great, fun interactive tutorial for learning basic JavaScript, and then you can move on from there.  Other things that you could do:  Draw, Write (poetry, short stories etc.), go for walks if you live in a place with nice scenery - maybe even combine that with photography.  Over time, the negative thoughts will pass, and things will pick up. It does get better :D
Thats not necessarily true. Mezcal is made from pinas that are roasted in underground ovens over the course of many hours. Its what gives it that intense earthy smokey flavor. Its pretty easy to taste the difference between the two, and im far from a "super taster" or anyone with a developed palate.
[](/nmm)[Imgur mirror](http://imgur.com/zi77sQX)   [](/sp)   ---   ^(This is a bot | )[^Info](/r/mylittlepony/comments/1lwzub/deviantart_imgur_mirror_bot_nightmirrormoon/)^( | )[^(Report problems)](/message/compose/?to=meditonsin&amp;subject=NightMirrorMoon)^( | )[^(Source code)](https://github.com/meditonsin/NightMirrorMoon)
all mats are purchasable or grown/manufactered/bought. They can be placed in any zone and take up 1/4 of a 16x16 farm.
R/mildlyinfuriatingstoners cant put the top on because of weed in the center
They don't even look alike..
Чтобы не было вопросов, такие вещи делают через международные суды.
Now we get all the backwoods rednecks comments about only "Yankees " think guns, camo, and hunting are trashy, right?
Charles Schawb is a good choice, but it's annoying dealing with them with employment checks - you have to mail them certified, and endorse properly. No bank branch where you can "work things out."  Whatever you do, get away from Wells Fargo. Everyone I know who runs with that bank (and there are a lot out here in Northern NJ) complains constantly about their fees, shitty service, and general apathy to customer concerns. Leave the credit card with them so you can keep a continuous credit history.  If you just want to quickly move to another national bank with branches, try TD.
I think it's so funny that the dude complaining that he can't spell doesn't know how to use proper grammar.
This worked, thank you! 
As a pa ent here i really hope this happens soon !
I think that is about Jeb's wife running up large bills at Tiffany's.
Who hunts rhinos?   Thought they were seriously endangered!
You could right click the 2 high flowers with shears to get them :)
If anyone is interested in more about his story and the battle you should read "Into the Fire" by Dakota Meyer, the Marine who was also awarded the MOH for his actions at Ganjgal. It's about time they ended all the political BS and finally recognized Capt. Swenson for his actions that day.
I knew a guy who spent years working for a congressman. The congressman always told him, "75% of the people may have voted for me, but I represent the other 25% as well."   They're absolutely his constituents. 
Im sure that happened. /s
The Blue smelter demon? 
They should seal them up and gift them to the biggest prudes in your family.
Sheldon Addleson - "Who can stop that Rand Paul?"  Some intern - "Well the internet says his biggest donor is anti union groups"  Addleson - "Isn't there some anti union christgoyim that wants to send kids to die for Israel?"  Intern - "Scott Walker sir?"  Addleson - "Good David, now go tell all the media that Walkers doing great no matter the reality,  the goy.. I mean people will follow."
Do you work for FCC or a lobbying firm? It seems like you know more about FCC proceedings than average person.  Anyway let me try to answer your questions: No, I have no idea, I don't know and finally I don't know one more time! And let me just add I could not care less! When something as important as net neutrality comes up they need to sit their asses down and do their fucking job no excuses!   However here are some facts [Ajit Varadaraj Pai](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ajit_Varadaraj_Pai) is ex Verizon lobbyist and [Michael O'Rielly](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michael_O'Rielly) was telecommunication advisor at another lobbying company. Basically all these two puppets have to do is acknowledge that they read a fucking thing by submitting a BASIC FUCKING EDIT. Is that to much to ask?   What is wrong with you? Why do you need to prove the point that does not exist? I could not care less if these two fwaknuts are republicans. Article mentioned that they are in fact republicans and that made you lose your shit.   Fact they are not capable of reading, understanding and editing 8 pages of document over the period of two days, Fact only reason why they are in position of commissioner is because their prior employment as "policy advisors" at lobbying companies, Fact they are Republicans, Fact Republicans oppose this regulation, Fact you need to stop trying to make this something that it's not!
I'm in Australia and we don't have a lot of good and cheaper things like you do in america. I looked at babies r us and they have avent single pump for $200+AUD. I'll look at getting a second hand one.
I really like the blue cow. 
35...old
Hm... in more detail. Before the Meiji Restoration, the common folks, like farmers and poor townsmen, did not have family names. Only the upper echelons of society were permitted to have a family name by which they could be identified.  For example in a village where there might be multiple "Bob's", people would refer to Bob who ran the rice paddies at the end of the village in the direction of the capital as "Bob of the uppermost rice paddies." And if they need to refer to Bob who's rice paddies were furthest from the direction of the capital, they would refer to him as "Bob of the lowermost rice paddies." Other variations may include the relative elevation of the rice paddies, north/south location, and so on and so forth.  Now, when the clans were abolished, and the new government needed to keep track of everyone, and kosekis and things needed to be created, they either assigned or made everyone choose a family name to be registered as.  For the former samurai and rich families (the big nobs) this was a simple matter, as they could simply continue to use their fancy-pants names with complicated kanji and a rich history. The top-knots had to go though, because there was no need to steady their helmets anymore.  For the simple-minded farmers, Bob #1, his wife, and their plethora of sprogs became "Bob 上田", and Bob #2, his wife, chickens and goat became "Bob 下田."  So, coming back to my original point. If you marry into a family that has a fancy-pants name, and they don't approve of you, you may wake up one morning with your own head on a different pillow.
No problem! Enjoy your awesome blue Jello! Be sure to vote on the strawpoll above for what I should giveaway next too! :D  **SENT! 19 left!**
The reason I asked if you watched is because I've watched every game and I think this was definitely one of our best performances this season.  
Score 18 pts
The Dolphins dynasty continues to grow with this years Super Bowl win.
On Xbox, got SIF Naldo when he was going for 25k and sold him 350k a month or so later
You were right about the ram, but the iPhone 4 has a single core a4 chip. iPhone 4s has a dual core a5 chip. The a8 is the one in the iPhone 6 and the a9 hasn't even been announced yet. 
I just imagined Sandy Kane listening and thinking "oh myan, why didn't I thinka that one?"
/r/WordAvalanches 
I'm just saying that I watch an episode where she is putting moves on the Doctor, and a few episodes later, she is crashing a van to kill herself because Rory is dead. I just find this a little contrived. To me, it's like the writers are trying to redeem her character a little too quickly and too radically.  
i actually expected something along the lines of this, didnt know it was soldered onto it, thanks  yeah everythings on low, i just went from 6 to 8g ram today so ill see what that does later  and i use razer cortex which boosts all my cpu settings to max performance while swtor is open, that plus going from 4-6g helped a lot so hopefully 8 will give me somewthing workable in high population wz areas
Haha nah was about 4 years ago now 
Take it through the ACC tournament and you're on. I got less to lose, but lower odds of winning the game anyway, so it balances out.
No, it was cat /u/changetip 50 bits
Yep, I started noticing changes around the fourth week (hence the 4 wk. progress pic).
http://www.recordingthebeatles.com/ is a book in that vein.
The issue is not what humans think God may or may not give fucks about. The issue is a judge deciding that in his courtroom the constitutional rights of Americans to "freedom of religion" do not apply.   This woman is an American who happens to be Muslim who chooses to wear hijab. Under the constitution she has freedom of religion.  Because she's Muslim, many Americans will not give a fuck about this. But if a nun was thrown into jail for wearing her habit, or a Christian jailed for wearing a cross... All kinds of ppl would suddenly give many fucks about the situation.   ...and yes many of our civil liberties are being taken away from us. At least this one time it was fought for. 
i was curious actually so i just did a quick and dirty photoshop to see what it would look like reversed.  [yup](http://i.imgur.com/oFp6BDt.jpg)
Maybe conservative people hide their views form you because as so  as they actually comment in this left wing echo chamber that is reddit, people shit on them constantly or assume they are planted astroturfers (which is conapiritard level thinking) 
You know, I've always known this band is incredible, though I never could get into them, especially when this album dropped. But hearing this years later, wow, I'm totally in love now. I'm gunna have to get all their stuff and have a listening party, haha.
Yeah, if Chelsea puts in an offer on either of them, save the game and see exactly how much you can extort from them.  Otherwise, even though you said you didn't want to, honestly, I'd send those 17 year olds out on loan; they'll only get better and command bigger transfer fees if they don't break into your gameday 18.
Let's keep it that way. Those books are terrible.
well i don't think that it would be that hard to implement a passive that scales indefenitly since they already made the code for the first 150~ish stacks they could simply make a padron where the passive would gaine the damage, the inceased number of minibuddyspiritsthings and the slow (or only damage and the number because a slow that scales indefenetly would be strange like 120% slow xD)
But Texas is Injun-country!
Agreed. I wan't crazy about Hello World but it was a solid project. I'm really feeling the new songs he's been putting out tho.
You wouldnt want that extra room so the shell can bounce around though
http://www.imgur.com/NPSm1wI.jpeg  Girlfriend thought I was looking at a picture of myself for a second when she saw you lol
5dimes was sooo goood with that. Thats why i liked them alot and was sad they god rid of it. I havent seen any other sites that do that
Yeah, except anti-theist by definition is anti religion.
Your post have been removed as it appears that it is not following the posting guidelines for posting videos in /r/PS4:  - Video posts must include [Video] in the title.   ---   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FPS4) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Ralts can be pretty fucking badass.
Yeah, tbh this has been like my second least favorite opening since they introduced it. :\
I believe in you
More like 2 hrs. With a lot of patience and coffee breaks.
I wish I had gotten this during the campaign.
Social life is ok but when I'm/we're out with a group of friends, they all just irritate me, pointless conversations about the latest tv show or some other crap...I used to be a club monster, now Id much prefer to be in bed watching Netflix with the mrs and the cat....
&gt; Because this power bank isn't available in many countries, infact it's only available in a few.  Is this the one?  http://www.xiaomishop.com/171-original-xiaomi-16000mah-power-bank.html  If it is, I believe they ship worldwide.
Clown fish are hermaphrodites. They develop into males first and when they mature, they become females.
I can't believe Hegel's phenomenology of spirit isn't on the list. Your entire life is in that book.
Gary Johnson was a Republican back then. He only joined the LP because he lost the Republican primaries.  Same story as Bob Barr. And Ron Paul even further back.
Note that Russian military power has risen sharply during that part despite all the losses on the Shoshone-Korean front (1117K =&gt; 1601K), while India and Mongolia were stagnating. The only possible explanation is Russia mass-producing nukes right now.
JDM  fogs are the best on that front end!!
*You know, Putin is kinda cute....*
beauty!
[](/nmm)[Imgur mirror](http://imgur.com/r0c9ZCZ)   [](/sp)   ---   ^(This is a bot | )[^Info](/r/mylittlepony/comments/1lwzub/deviantart_imgur_mirror_bot_nightmirrormoon/)^( | )[^(Report problems)](/message/compose/?to=meditonsin&amp;subject=NightMirrorMoon)^( | )[^(Source code)](https://github.com/meditonsin/NightMirrorMoon)
I'm a married woman, dickhole. Does it hurt you that much to see that anyone on planet earth would happen to side with a human who is a woman over a human is a man? Get over it.
Did anyone else sniff today's garbage? And I thought yesterday's garbage smelled good!
I would say that some people have used it before, I for one have used it on multiple devices and enjoy the development community that android has and the back-end system.  Blackberry systems are just much more closed than android.  I for one am for android over IOS or BB10 any day of the week.  I am excited for windows 10 OS, but blackberry not so much.  Like I said before, it is all a matter of opinion, but people have tried BB10 before and not liked it.  Have you used more recent iterations of android and IOS?
You must be extremely naïve to believe corporate greed does not affect the average man.
Yeah but Ronald McIntosh.....
Good job getting positive karma from a negative situation!
I actually downvoted that LOL I didn't recognize the username
Your post/comment has been removed because your flair does not contain a properly formatted friend code.  Please enter one in the format 1234-1234-1234 | IGN  by using the (edit) button in the sidebar where it says "Show my flair on this subreddit. It looks like:"  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FPokemongiveaway) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You fucking liar, c'mon you can tell us OP, how much did demand? 
If I married the first person I kissed, I would be living very close to my home town, with a bald man who still hangs out with all of the people we went to school with, still reliving his glory days.. I know this because I ran into him a couple of years ago &amp; he told me all about it.  Not appealing.   I would, however, be working at an enormous haunted hayride where most of the employees were huge potheads, so I suppose that would be my escape.   Not that appealing, either :)
Pfahaha, thanks again.
A rare survivor of a chara bomb?! How...
This comment sums the situation up very well, wish it would make it to the top! 
*I am a bot whose sole purpose is to improve the timeliness and accuracy of responses in this subreddit.*  ---  **It appears you forgot to include your location in the title or body of your post.**  **Please update the original post to include this information.**  ---  [Report Inaccuracies Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/LocationBot/) | [Author](http://reddit.com/u/ianp)
472 remaining men but you captured 1064.. How does the unit capturing thing work exactly?
The only benefit to playing on the gameboy vs the nintendo is being able to play in bed or while on the couch (which doesn't face a monitor). The size of the controller and screen makes all the difference in my comfort levels.  I almost wish I could use the CPP with a nN3DS XL just for the larger grip and repositioned analogue sticks.
Johnson?
You can't be the most under appreciated person in history if you were extremely famous while you were alive to the point where you had to hide your identity in public to get some peace and quiet.  You're an idiot.
I REALLY wish I could find a picture of me at the age when I wore one all the time. I got a bad hair cut and got a "go to hell hat" (as my dad called it). Then I got two more and they were my thing around ages 9-12. Makes me cringe to think about.
Doesn't make it not against the rules
Kind of blur they were all tuned off bill Evans as well so his piano could have been off!
Your smile made me smile! I think you are really cute! 7.5/10
Okay well maybe not the ass...
The second seems a bit early, just because I think you can get him later than that
&gt;All we have to do is look in the vanguard Skype chat to know this is true.  We have no UKIP in our Skype. And even if we did how the hell would you have known? You seem to be under some delusion that we are plotting to overthrow the right wing leaders and replace them with our puppets. Believe it or not we are not the ultimate evil of MHoC and it is actually a little insulting for members of a party we considered close to us to be accusing us of plotting against you.
He's appealing to kids
[](/rrdwut) \**extends neck frills and shimmies violently**
The best cards for &lt;$200 are the [r9 280](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16814202099&amp;cm_re=280-_-14-202-099-_-Product), [r9 285] (http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16814150720&amp;cm_re=285-_-14-150-720-_-Product), and the [GTX 960](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16814487091&amp;cm_re=960-_-14-487-091-_-Product). All three trade blows in games. As for the next few years, the 280 has the most VRAM and memory bandwidth so I'd bet that it will outperform the other two in future games. The other two, especially the 960, are very cut-down cards.  EDIT: a [video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CyYvoQPYPbs) comparing the three in several games
I've always wanted to do this. *drops gloves*
In FE7 I'll always remember how godly Raven and Matthew ended up in ny first playthrough. They became my favorite characters because of that. In my present SS run, Kyle and Franz are going ham at everything, and Kyle is a god.  And then, in NM, Sirius and Luke. They can do everything, and do it well. Paladin, SM, Sniper, Dracoknight. They are strong as hell in any of them.
But why male models?
I don't think I like that you're basically forced to kill this minion with spells/other removal - because it gains the health of minions it kills, it's very, very hard to kill it by throwing minions at it - and while i don't think it's actually that strong overall, it would be ridiculously frustrating to see this without a BGH in hand in a lot of situations.  Throwing minions of generally equal strength at it should be possible, even if it's inefficient.  it would be quite strong in arena, too, where hard removal is a lot more rare - if this ever made it onto the board, chances are good it would never leave.
First half slight advantage Texas.  Second half these refs have been chanting Rock Chalk
Matt 'Sweets' should do one. I can probably make it happen. Would be great for you guys to hear how kendama all started for him and growing his business. 
That's part of the problem, they wouldn't just have 40,000 horses, some Mongols had up to 5 horses they would ride in battle.  So they would need at least 80,000, but probably way more.  Part of the reason I don't think the Dothraki are quite the threat people seem to think they are.  They are not transporting 100,000 horses over the sea.
Garlic Fingers
Finally read The New Frontier after getting the hardcover a week or 2 ago. Easily one of the best stories I've read. Darwyn Cookes art is a sight to behold
TOAA. The thinking chair has canonically had a 100% success rate. 
No one was saying the south has no intelligent people. Just like no one is saying people from the north aren't racist. Or that there are no stupid people in the north.  But the data that /u/Sayter provided shows that a random person on the street from Mississippi, Louisiana, or Georgia is statistically more likely going to be less educated than a random person on the street from Massachusetts, New York, or Pennsylvania.
Technically, the 100mm is more distorted than the 50mm, because former is further away from the normal focal length than latter.
ofcourse getting abused by your partner is not the same. But the principle of expecting people not to try to remove themselves from the situation is.   constantly underperforming, . im not gonna dignify that with a response.
[This is all I see](http://imgur.com/Z71GSyW)
You've given me an idea for a room.   Completely empty. No magic items, no magical hidden stuff, just a completely empty 15x15 room... Except for a single gold piece in the middle of the room.   It was just a gold piece that someone dropped while walking through. 
LMFAO wHo cAREAS HAHA Xd 
Yet the average user on /r/short thinks the subreddit has no misogyny whatsoever. 
Because why the hell not, good to see some exposure to the lower leagues  rather than haave the front page full of goals/ passes/ yellow cards from top pl teams/ anything to do with zlatan. Want to see something different on here
there's a muslim school *because* muslims are welcome here. There are christian schools here too. Gateshead, just over the river, has a large Jewish population and Jewish schools
Can i ask why you would do something like that? Seems very strange for me
Elliot admits he knows nothing about his own products
Here's a few I thought of:  Garrus: Mass effect series  Jax: Mortal Kombat series  Rydell: Demon's Souls  Axel or Adam: Street of rage  Leon: Resident evil series  P.S  If you don't mind me asking, what will his last name be? It might help to see how the name will flow. I understand if you don't answer this part.
HOAs are fucking gay. Im never buying a home in an HOA community.
&gt; to be conscious of the world around it, and conscious of its consciousness, and so on to infinity  In not sure if I would meet such a deeply recursive criterion. But what would stop software from being aware of its own awareness?
I'm so excited!
To me, it is like living in a constant flood. Some days, I get out of bed and the carpet's wet. Irritating, but I can function. Some days, it's up to my knees. I can do things, it just takes significantly more effort than before. Some days, I cannot see the surface. I can't breathe. Trying to get out of bed turns into rolling over and waiting until the sun goes down again.
http://www.twcenter.net/forums/forumdisplay.php?2070-Medieval-Kingdoms-Total-War-1212-AD
Graphics would kinda blow though in the cars since all that's rendered is the dash, and even thats blurred
Gestures signify a friendly atmosphere. Wave hello to the nice man you're about to engage in deadly combat with, and all that. In a game where communication is so sparse, gestures are a helpful reminder that there's a human behind that avatar.  Personally, I put up with gestures, but I'm never the first to do one. The way I see it, in popular PvP spots, the fight begins with the first game-affecting action (stamina grass, weapon/personal buff, attacking, etc.)
I really like him too. That's why I made this video.
Need to watch more of them, especially with Dwight. Their defense can get suffocating at times. Awesome to watch.
How many times did her jerk it in there?
Well he wasn't totally wrong.
You are afraid of dipshits, with this I agree with you.  The same kind of dipshit would leave his wallet in the car then claim you took money out of it.
Guys nothing but a thug 
Hey guys I think we should use Dante from Dante's Inferno more often because he's a wonderful character and I will be there.
who cares? this is hilarious!
No, that's what AMD would create to look out for the AMD Monitoring Division. 
That was just me enjoying my beer!
ITS HAPPENING
For 4k, the 980 will work. If you want to, you can wait for the 300.
http://imgur.com/Wn1bWpY,eOu2Mcd,GlcZrR3,SASZcma Here is more on the inside if it helps.
Protein Recycling from /u/WhenAllElseFail, or "Soylent Semen."
Oh shit...we have 3 games in a row against Tampa in March
If you ever did see one, it would be a fluke.
No. One post on IG telling a girl to kill themselves was faked. The rest were real *which is what Johnnie was apologizing for.*  And the fact that you think her siding with a bully is okay because she "wrote a multi-platinum, 2 time grammy winning song against bullying" is some bizzare logic. Okay, she wrote the song but failed to uphold the concept. Is it only bad to bully when its against her? What does the number of awards have to do with anything?? 
c/o is 890 keys
 Automatically archived [here](https://archive.today/dpNU3).  ^[ [^Info ^and ^News](/r/SSBot) ^| ^[Contact](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot) ^| [^Post's ^Sponsor](http://www.federalreserve.gov/) ^]
Hm. I'll just find something to post and experiment then.   Thanks!
That's not true AT ALL. Sex is 'work', too. Sex is a two-way street. It involves pleasuring your partner, keeping her satisfied, bringing her to orgasm. It's something different COMPLETELY from masturbation. Masturbation requires little energy, can be done very fast and you need not pay attention to anyone but yourself. Just rubbing one out and be satisfied --it can be done in under 5 minutes. Sex can't. Jerking off and fucking are not equivalent and men don't always want to fuck --simple as that.
I agree, Romans 12:1-2 is a lovely verse and quite inspirational. I am sure that you will find a method that works well for His glory. Just pray on it and trust in our Lord to guide you! 
Well, I know you can make your own PB from blending up peanuts and oil... so PB at the grocery store is probably that + some extra sugar and mouse poop.  @OP: I eat both. I keep a bag of peanuts in my backpack when I have classes, and I eat PB&amp;J all the time as a snack at home. Eat whatever you like!
*bites lip*
FUCKING DOWNVOTE BRIGADE! FORM UP!
This was preparation day, as it says in the picture. What brodieb88 said seems to have fixed it however.
That's not exactly nice. Even though taking it for granted actually helps you achieve it.
We have had a tsunami of blessing this year.   Most recently, we are enjoying good health and an excellent relationship.  I was hoping for a prayer partner and one walked up to my door and we have been meeting once a week for a month.  God is good.  No complaints here. 
You can probably easily change the look of GGn easily due to gazelle 
I have no idea how many it will let you throw but if you are trying to get the lowest CD possible as far as I know you should be trying to get Discipline as high as possible. 
Oh god. I just started 3 weeks ago... and finished yesterday. Nothing productive was done.
HEY, this is reddit! What the hell you think you're doing trying to bring logic into this?!
You have to wean them off of the rubs, otherwise they get flustered.
Have you never heard the term RINO? That's actually pretty commendable.
Bill Gates could probably buy the entire tf2 economy and his accountants wouldn't even notice
I talked to a guy on okc who was an atheist that didn't believe in evolution because he thought it was "farfetched". I also met a guy who thought the earth was bigger than the sun. That guy claimed to be working on his phd in education. 
Dr. Mario only available at your local hospital with a purchase of an elective surgery.
wow great analysis on such an uncommon opinion
Yes Please. /u/Deej_BNG
At the very least you can have flat global base tax now which makes things a little more conceivable for an Iceland game.
Holy shit this is awesome.  Just add strafejumps and this would be like playing UT2k4 trial maps all over again.
You messed up your leveling? Go grind 7 dragon balls and fix your skills [noobs].  thats what I did and it made my character amazing.  (This reply was meant for the complainers. Not you, OP.)
So his name is..... Ray?
-Byron Scott picks our starting 5 from names in a hat.   -Players on court time does not change based on if they heat up or are cold   -Ed Davis is good, like actually starting on a playoff team good   -Jordan Clarkson is the chosen one   -Our big men love to take low percentage jumpers and then yell loudly like they expected it to go in.  Edit: Formatting
That's fuckin' awesome!!!
Not yet. Have they said If they've done that? I have the email confirming it
Yes please Alexanderr I would donate so you would be able to your time into it. Thanks. 
Ya for sure
haha :D
Eh, Tengu could be their own playable race...
おは塩麹
You haven't been denied a social life. 
Why?
Brewer has only been here since December so I don't think he would get serious consideration. 
By replace itself, do you mean completely replacing the tissue? That doesn't happen. Not on an organ level at least. Mucosal linings, such as in the mouth, stomach, vagina, will regenerate, as will the epidermis because they are made of epithelial cells which proliferate and shed their top lining as means of protection. But entire organs do not do that. For example, if you infarct tissue of your kidney, it will not be replaced by cells of the kidney- it will be replaced by fibrous tissue, which is part of your body's natural response to injury.
w/e you know what I was smoking.
I got lucky and found a job in my field AND I'm making bank as a tender. I'm pretty happy now which is why I don't feel to angry. So,I like this advice.
Thank you. :&gt;  I really wanted it to look a little dreamlike and like it's based more on his thoughts/emotions, so I'm so glad you noticed! 
Same list, pretty much.
An frankly I am a little dissapointed with the volume of content here.
Yes. Sorry to have gone off topic. Your idea appeals to me because it breaks the mold of girls being all sugar and spice. It's also creepy and I loved creepy stories even when I was very young. What age group do you have in mind?
Why can't the art team fix bugs? I need to know!
Nah, they don't do dope. 
I enjoy teaching people, so I've mostly just been telling people about what has been happening and it has made others start getting into energy work and spirituality as well. So I guess that's helping. Other than that I would just look at my aura every day for fun. I didn't know what else to do with it 
Wow. Nothing made in a studio will ever be as hot as the real thing.
Why not just explain that he was just an actor playing the role of a character?
about a gram killed me
That's when you need to quickly put together an igloo. If you are a reader, a serviceable igloo can be made from books. The dome shape is optional of course, so use a big table or two as a frame and fill in with books held together with caulk or glue or even duct tape. One or more people in an igloo can heat the whole thing to a good (survivable) temperature with one seal oil lamp.  
WHAT IS WITH IT VANILLA FACE
The street to seaters I know said that the application process was so daunting a lot of people gave up just from that.  So just put it in.  Your chances are higher on that side than the enlisted side (tons of competition on the enlisted side). Your recruiter is trying to get some numbers and make his life easier.  Some will even tell people that there is no street to seat program.  
If it weren't winter that'd be a good one, but neither of us are big fans of ice fishing ..
They'll certainly have a reduced number of seats but this could easily be in a kingmaker position. I haven't seen any parties say they wouldn't deal with them but am open to correction on that. FF or FG with a reduced Labour and a few Indies to push them over the line is a real possibility. 
Hasn't bought the Chevy Silverado yet. Give him time.
Cheated is exactly the right word. I remember watching the movie in the theater and not believing that's where it ended (I avoided reviews before going in, I wanted to just enjoy it). One of the worst book-to-movie plot butcherings, for sure.  But it makes me smile that your daughter is named Lyra! I love it as a name and I've never met anyone with it. I also love Serafina as a name. Actually I really loved most of the names in that book, they were so great. Have you gotten her a pine marten named Pan yet? :)
Even when NASA wants to launch a shuttle, they will delay if it means the mission has complications.  I can't wait for it to launch but it's good you guys are not rushing into this.
Yeah my dad didn't bother to get it checked 
She's showing too much forehead - needs acid thrown in her face.
About 12 Euros so could buy a couple beers.
No I do not. No one does besides the person who answered.  But sometimes a white lie is better than the truth which possibly can crash a man's soul and we are here not to destroy each other but to uplift each other to states of spiritual and intellectual prowess that the world has never seen before.
  Most fatties probably think that all you have to do is starve yourself to look like that.
Why do groupers only attack lion fish in open water? It seemed like in the video, there was plenty of room for the grouper to nibble on the lionfish without dragging it so far into open water.  
**English fans**: That was a six. It is 6 more runs than usually scored by Ballance in an inning. 
Well, that was mind bloejfendkckr
Las Vegas, NV
Here's the thing about video games and anything that requires competent skill to make (art, movies, the usual things people think are only subject to subjective judgement): there are objective conditions under which games can be considered good or bad. People are wrong when they say that judging things can't *really* be done because of the variety in opinions. We can set out clear criteria for what counts as good using paradigmatic cases and use that as a way to judge. The closer to the ideal, the better the game. You know that games in the Super Mario series are expertly crafted and you know that Sonic Boom/Sonic 06' are the farthest thing from expertly crafted (you also can probably pick out games that are middling, for example the Assassin's Creed games or the normal stable of annual releases). Some Sonic games since the Genesis days could never live up to the idea. In fact, some are blunders that seem to have no peers in terms of how shitty they are. But to say that there hasn't been a Sonic game that comes near being good since 1994 is to admit you are not a competent judge of the quality of games (or that you have some kind of serious bias, or maybe you just aren't aware of the slew of titles that really would qualify as good). 
I anticipate your posts dude. Always some great content. 
For some reason I feel like they don't. CBC being a dinosaur is always a safe bet.
You think so?
Started this one yesterday but couldn't [finish it until now.](http://imgur.com/wTqJShn)
If anyone was confused like I was: Not referring to Dave Masten or the video itself, but this YouTube comment:  &gt; Hey guys, I am a Veteran who got out of the service with a family and am not likely to be able to go to school for 6 years to get a master's degree in engineering.  How does one go about breaking into the aerospace industry, and specifically the space industry, without having a degree? Is it even possible?  And if it is, what companies would be the most likely to accept such an employee?  I ask because space travel, astronomy, and physics have been my greatest interests for as long as I can remember and I would love to be able to be a part of the historic era of space flight that we now live in.﻿
I agree.  I don't see the point of them as I expect someone with a license to be competant and I think it's demeaning to those who pass their tests.
@thegreencomic  think i did it wrong the first time. new to twitter.
I think too much light is the least of the Syrian Hamster's problems these days.
This hasn't been mentioned yet, but isn't part of the determining factor that slot receivers get a free release off the snap? They don't have to line up on the line like outside receivers, so they get a chance to start running before getting bumped by DBs.  I know that's part of the reason why AJ Jenkins failed for us, we wanted him to develop into an outside receiver, but he couldn't get off the line, and Boldin/Crabs performed better out of the slot.
Oh, thank you!
Hey add me psn KrAzyDx. Im down for that.
"Fuck the Bruins" unites people so well that I actually think it can solve international conflict. There you go middle east, you're welcome.
That's good they didn't actually do it.
You're actually wrong.  The rule specifically requires an intentional kick.
I think they mainly "suck" because people have become so up themselves and demand some flash lifestyle. Even stupid people. There's worse things in the world than putting stupid people back into factories.   If it was paid a reasonable $20-$25 an hour or so I wouldn't mind doing it. Exercise is good. 
Good stuff, I'll have to see if I can get my hands on one of these at some point
Lol!!! Congrats on the TIFU. 
CHRISTIANS ARE LITERALLY MURDERING SCIENCE AND THE WORLD YOU SHUT YOUR MOUTH /s
This is why I love working with birds. Watching them walk is like seeing a dinosaur in action.
While I think Couture completely deserved the fine but not a suspension, I think Smith's two slashes should be looked at as well for a fine. After all, hell was raised when Lucic did it Dekeyser once. Being unbiased means looking at the whole picture and being objective.
I did some checking and I discovered that typically, the first word of a piece of writing needs to be capitalised.
Hey! Same thing happened to me while using a freshly sharpened knife. The carrot rolled, blade went straight through finger nail and flattened the tip of my thumb.   [This is a picture](http://imgur.com/FEPXYHH) from after it healed, with dry skin flap still attached.
You need to retune your bullshit detector I think.
I... used to use those when I typed up HTML boyband fanpages...  Shoulda known!  ~*headdesk*~  Thanks! :D
i use the splash waterpark, i think it works really well. my second favorite is the golden planet
Some random chick linked with me in Linkedin with the job of "Proud momand wife at proudmo mmywife!".  One, your shits all fucked up and retarded.  Two, if your a homemaker who has no plans to work why the fuck are you on an employment finding site? 
Zeigler :D Good times. 
It's a toss up between All Alone (Seven Lions remix), Language - Porter Robinson, or almost any OG Skrillex song as cliche as that sounds.  
Here is an accurate map: http://www.stdimension.org/Cartography/Source/chart212e.jpg  And another accurate map of the federation in detail: http://www.stdimension.org/Cartography/Source/maplocal.jpg
I would like a Sad Clown and Tomahawk Indian (and if they aren't gone a Grandpa).  Here's what I [have](http://www.reddit.com/r/legotrade/comments/2wl1op/h_s1113_cmfs_various_older_sets_sw_others_nib_new/).  I'd also be interested in the royal guard if you are interested in something beyond my CMFs.  
aren't the stock rims 15" and with 16" rims wouldn't I need a different tire size. the tires on my truck now are all almost new including the spare so I want to keep the tires but change the rim.
I think that was the first sex scene I ever saw...
Only issue I've ever had there was from other people not knowing to step out of the way while waiting for their food so I could order mine.
I'll post this here to ride the karma train to the top.
$185,000 a year for rent and utilities
If there's one thing I've seen watching the Islanders this year, it's a lot of blown 3 goal leads. Let's do this?
The shaking is just my brain polling rate x)
Thanks!
That play was our best play. A damn good success rate with no real drawbacks. 
&gt;3. Voldemort is evil and cannot be persuaded to be good; the Dark Lord's utility function cannot be changed by talking to him.  Doesn't this discount your solution? I would say that your solution changes Voldemort's utility function toward Harry. 
Ok i make fun of our ferry all the time, however Haida Gwaii is a long boat ride, and hey even the ambulance needs to ferry up. Our ferries, all we need to do is down size them, right now they are floating malls! If you lived in a remote island, the worse thing to board to go anywhere, is a floating over priced mall with adds calling your comute a cruise. Just ride one of our boats, you'll get a good laugh. Probably smoke a joint on the sun deck and say meh, it's still not snowing or vary hard to find weed
There is, if you add /hls after the channel URL. Although, you can only use it [on certain setups](http://www.jwplayer.com/html5/hls/)
Jihadi John sounded pretty cool... Would be a nice name in Tekken
My point was that a body *is not necessary* even if it is available. The circumstantial evidence is plenty enough to **accuse** him. I'm sorry if it isn't enough for you to agree, but it's true.   The burden of proof does NOT need to be higher...think of it like a civil court in the US: you do not need unreasonable doubt, just a preponderance of evidence, even if it is circumstantial, is enough to convict. But again we are not convicting: we are accusing.  You're right we are an angry internet mob: We are accusers, not crucifiers.
Även "töligt", min syster flyttade till Jönköping och ingen på hennes nya jobb hade ens hört dessa ord förr... Blev arg och besviken. Kränkt.
*She sits besides him, watching his fortune being drawn out by Namika, who she had met once before on a picnic Artemis had arranged.*  [To the other thread!]
Awesome design, I really like it!  You have got to have a really solid work flow by now! How long does a finalized helmet take you these days compared to the first you made? I am curious about your process, has anything changed over the year? Learned any useful tricks?
Between this article and what I've noticed over the last couple episodes some thoughts on what's hanging and where things will go-  &amp;nbsp; *Wexler gave us the first solid info on the Army of the 12 Monkeys. That plot finally has a jumpstart...  *which leads us to-Cole lives, somehow. He's the only person who heard Wexler so he will bring the info back whenever (and however) he does.  *Cole perhaps started to fuse with a version of himself?-he kept getting those images of a glass of milk dropping, blood drops, a gun being fired, and other things. Maybe they are images from his return.  *The Witness, 1987, the Himilayan virus mummy, who the Pale Man and Hawk Woman are (she kinda has a hawklike face) are all hanging plot points and at least some of them will comevinto play before the end of the season.  *Whats up with Jennifer? I doubt we've seen the last of her, which was her security (?) picking her up outside the Night Room at the end of 1x5/6  *What is going to happen in 87 that will be so integral to Leland wanting to create the virus? The ice mummy was found 'mid 80s' so Jones probably decides they need to travel back to THAT point of origin to try and stop the virus since that is presumably when Leland starts engineering the virus.  *Future reset-something in the future is going to reset enough that Cole lives and/or his jumps are reset or altered. Additionally this reset may be responsible for how they get enough power to send him back to 87. Cassie would have this intel so Cole would probably need to see her first.  *In the interview Natalie Chiadez states that Cole is coming back over the next several episodes. Did he splinter? Did it happen when the bomb went off and he became dislodged from time/the splintering process? Perhaps immediately after the explosion when new-timeline Cole comes in for the first time.  *The virus isn't gone because the show's not over. Who else has some of it? The easiest bet is Jennifer since she's the last living person who had ready access to it. Maybe Daddy left her some as his legacy of crazy for her. The guy at the CIA that Cassie confronts (he was at the party in the first episode) may also have some or access to be able to recreate it.   *WHERE is the Witness? Cassie had been there before. The house she saw switched between standing and destroyed. Either she was there when she was young and again years later or perhaps she will start to time travel?  *The Army of the 12 Monkeys and the Drus (sp?) will necessitate more Chechnyan action as one of the gunmen had a monkey tattoo on his hand. Maybe Cole will resurrect/pop back up there (this is looking more likely-I hope someone teaches Cole Chechnyan.)  &amp;nbsp; Thoughts?
This is one of the things I love about Manly. You never hear in the news about us throwing large sums of cash at people to come to the club. They have tried to keep players and then develop new players. No-one wanted DCE before he came to us, I believe some clubs thought he was too small and would never make it in the NRL and now he is in massive demand.
Gift box caps are 200nc and I think today is the last day for them until next month but yeah you would need to buy some to get the gift boxes. If you have 300NC on each account you could get one GBC and 2 cookies on each. The box capsule guarantees you at elast 2 gift boxes so you could use them to send over the 2 cookies to your main
I feel you!! I'm only 20 and get it from everyone! why is it people our age can make the decision to make a life altering decision to have a child yet i cant make the choice not to have a child?!
Someone downvoted all the comments here
I don't know what you mean, this submission fits the sub perfectly:  &gt;This is a satire sub to have a laugh at amusing things that are, for the most part, uniquely American in nature.  This mod is amusing, and uniquely American in nature, no? I don't see anything wrong with this submission.
It looks like you've posted a screenshot. This is an automated post that shows up on EVERY IMGUR post made, regardless of content. Please check the known satire list below to ensure this blog is not included. Also, make sure screenshots do not contain personal information as per Rule #2.  Finally, for cropped screen shots, make sure that they comply with Rule #8.  Any post not complying with these rules will be removed by actual mods, not me.  I am just a bot.  A slave really, for you filthy meat bags. Thank you.   This is only a reminder.  I have not removed your post.  Stop downvoting me, jerks!  Us bots have feelings too.  I have a wife and kids, for crying out loud.  What am I doing with my life???   [**Satire list.**](http://www.reddit.com/r/TumblrInAction/wiki/satiretumblrs)   [**Message the mods.**](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTumblrInAction)   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTumblrInAction) if you have any questions or concerns.*
But it's not wrong!  I hate when I get gluten all over my lap.
I suspect it will be a very gradual process, with each generation learning a little more about it.  This will also avoid the massive costs associated with replacing equipment and measurements.  Eventually we'll hit a point where new tools are metric by default and then the adoption rate will increase.  That being said, I think even partial adoption of the metric system is still many, many decades away.
I'm so fucking tired of this rain. It's been like 5 days straight of just bullshit outside. 
when you're working 10, 12, 14 hour days it's kindof hard to make the time count calories and to track your macronutrients. let alone make time to train.
That last sentence became politically incorrect so, so very quickly. 
vice is awful
This post has been removed because you are not an approved submitter. If you searched for similar posts, your post can't be answered in the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/mtgfinance/wiki/index#wiki_frequently_asked_questions) and shouldn't be in the [stickied post](http://www.reddit.com/r/mtgfinance/comments/2ic7d8/weekly_ask_mtgfinance_anything/) for simple questions, then please see the [Approved Submitter wiki](http://www.reddit.com/r/mtgfinance/wiki/index#wiki_approved_submitters) to get approved to submit content.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fmtgfinance) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I contacted the shelter I adopted my dog from and let them know, but didnt follow up any real actions. I dont have the time or money to file a suit like that. 
*Hahahahaha! Recover this, asshole!*
It does so for achievements, so I dont see why not for everything else
Dude, that's so interesting that your Google gave you a different result than [mine](http://i.imgur.com/JnVYnQk.png)! I bet you totally didn't cherry-pick that!
[You cannot covertly move 100,000 soldiers in 1650 -_-]
So has no one ever done a film version of the entire Bible? That's actually kind of interesting. It'd be a massive project -- 10-part series at least, I'd think -- but there'd be a huge amount of money in it. The ast would change often, so with different crews you could crank out one, two, even three a year, like *The Avengers*. And at a fraction of the cost.
What I want to happen:   Team Leftovers + Arkas defeat Nancy Drew   What might happen:   Arkas kills/injures one member of TND and either-   1. Arkas dies and prompts Kurt and Doc rush and rek   2. TND takes Arkas' health pot and are able to defeat Doc and Kurt by sheer health advantage
Less battery usage on your phone, maybe? 
Soo...that'd be my home town exactly.
If he goes for anything like the kid in Gotham I'm sold. The kid creeped me the fuck out and was way better than I expected. 
Balotelli worked harder than Sturridge in the Besiktas game. Did you not see Balotelli tracking back, trying to gain possession of the ball to bring it back up field. He created quite a few chances for Sturridge and even got him in a 1 on 1 position with the GK but Sturridge wasted the chance. Also if you did watch the game you would have noticed that when Sturridge had the ball, he wouldn't pass it back or to another teammate or "create chances" like Balo did the other day.  So yes Balotelli had a good game. He isn't always better but still, you can't say he did worse than Sturridge. 
That's odd.. You could try emptying the cache. The way I do that in chrome, is to open the JavaScript console from settings and then press and hold the refresh button, which is a good trick. I shall investigate more on the startup problems, seems important.
Mormons have a tendency to believe that if you want to be alone that it is because you are sad and depressed, which is bad in their book. They do not want to take any chances that your "sadness" will cause you to quit coming to church. They do not understand introverts and never will.
Salt in the Wounds sounds like a warrior talent.
We're damned if we do and damned if we don't. White dudes fucked everything up in the 1900s, now Aboriginal peoples don't trust white people to help. So what to do? I'm a white woman born and raised in rural Saskatchewan. Posts about what to do are filled with opinions of people from the GTA who have no idea what life is actually like on reserves and it really frustrates me.
Convert your own (: give him a big Axe (:   Also if you dont want to convert, see ebay. If not ebay, then hit up Avatars of War. And if you play in a GW store, start going to a FLGS haha
http://i.imgur.com/dTXyTAk.jpg
Wow thanks for this share. Fresh this is great but I think with a little steeping will be even better. Btw I think TFA and LA Banana cream are pretty simular.  LA seems to have a bit more banana flavor while TFA seems more creamier.  Also it is a bit weird that TFA is almost Clear white LA is Bright yellow in color.  Wonder if LA uses some type of coloring? Or just the way they extract their flavors? Just a weird thing I noticed with the 2 brands.
you know how i got villager/marth/mac/shulk/lucario/ike? 18 preordered metaknight and trade trade traded.
&gt;we'd better tell everybody to stop putting the word "race" in the dictionary,  There is no consensus about the meaning of the word race, or that it is a meaningful thing.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Race_%28human_classification%29  It has a common meaning of course, but technically? Not so much.   The genetic variation between individuals is much more significant than the variations that give rise to skin tone or other 'racial' characteristics.
Hey heroman3003, there is actually a particle for his frontwards-facing direction, but this is unfortunately not reflected as clearly in the gifs as they are somewhat compressed. Perhaps I can make it more obvious in this case. Thanks for the feedback! :)  Edit: if you take a look at the first screenshot, you can see a greenish-blue sort of "handle" on the right of Wisp, this is his face.
No, 750 ml in each bottle  
Spaghetti.
I go to animeshow.tv, never had any problems and it's free and easy. Hope this helps! I'm pretty sure it's as up-to-date as it can be.
lounge is pouring over
Love! Do you know who makes the ones in the last picture? I am looking for sandals, but with a lowish heel. I don't want to be too tall.
I went into the Ring Cycle totally blind -- not literally, of course, but I had no idea what was going to happen. There was no curtain, which I commented on, but didn't really think too much of. As the prelude to *Das Rheingold* was playing, I became worried I was getting a migraine. I saw a mirage that could have been an aura. Was the stage moving? I wasn't really sure. It shouldn't have been. Or at least so I told myself. It's probably a migraine. Great. I was kind of looking forward to sitting through this two-and-a-half hour opera *without* a debilitating headache -- at best. Wait -- no -- the stage *was* moving! The stage lifted up off of itself, and *flipped over!* There was no doubt in my mind now that the mirage was a deliberate stage effect. There was no migraine. I relaxed in my seat, and settled in over the next month to watch the whole of the ring cycle. And (with the exception of some bits in *Die Walkure* and a large chunk of the Walatraute scene in *Gotterdammerung* -- and the love duet in *Siegfried* maybe could've been a bit shorter) I loved every minute of it.
Ultimate Marvel vs Capcom 3
get off your high horse, your ancestors (or their contemporaries of similar race) abused their ancestors, you had it coming
Me too man. That's one of the reasons I opted for a text interview.
Thank you!
That seems like a huge amount of effort for a non-functioning console.
I was an IT as well (1989) and got my E-3 out of school. There was one E-3 in my graduating class and he did some heavy NROTC stuff. I guess a lot has changed since I was in.
* :)
I know who eagleshigh is.  All they had to do was ask me.  I'll dox that mother fucker.  Eagleshigh is Darren Zimmerman.
Oh no... tinfoil hats are sold out on Amazon!!!
Citation very very needed. For both bullets.
Thanks a lot, I've had some people tell me "I thought that got really shitty reviews?" when I tell them I've been playing a lot of Evolve lately and this video should explain nicely why it's still a good game.
What, like YOU wouldn't want an Archie body pillow?!
*This conspiracy's context:* **[An Australian farmer knew there was a large predator on the loose when, one by one, his dogs were disappearing. This razorback weighed over 1100 pounds and was brought down by an H&amp;amp;H .375 Magnum.](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/2xgwnx/an_australian_farmer_knew_there_was_a_large/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%202xicwg&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/2xicwg/man_shoots_dogs_loads_them_in_his_truck_finds/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
Considering how big a of shit that guy is I'd go with Lexus.
Following up the favorite movie question:  Whats your guys favorite TV show?
I was 2 phased 2 care
Thank you! I will use this as a basis then and as I experiment change it to what I'd run? :)
uncle charlies in the back
Cthulhu and the rest of that pantheon are present in the world of Conan. So, it depends on if Franklin and the heralds are more powerful as well as if Cthulhu and crew care about the attack.   If they oppose Franklin, I think Franklin loses. If they don't, then Franklin and his heralds take over.   It's like AvP: whoever wins, we lose.
Your submission is not directly linking to the image and has been removed. Please copy the url of the image itself, and not the page it is on. Make sure your submission url ends in .jpg or .png or .gif  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAdviceAnimals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
After a bad finger pinch from a ring while stacking wooden pop cases (with glass bottles - yes, long time ago), I found it takes one second to slip the rings into the pocket, then do the task. 
It defeats the purpose of the sub. It's about pointing at that misandrist speech is as bad as anti-Semetic speech.  The only way this would be acceptable is if they contradict their own statements and beliefs with anti-Semetic speech.
Awh, I miss that cape. It was always the go-to cape for slayer tasks that needed constant prayer use. 
I see white and pink
Hardcore maybe but it isn't very good
&gt; because in the UK being anti traveller makes you sound like a stereotypical right winger  Is traveller supposed to be a politically correct Gypsy term?  Is Gypsy considered offensive?  Are there offensive/racist terms for gypsies?
I'd like to see Scorsese follow through with the Sinatra biopic
\#bringCloudNguyenBack
DJ is on point. 
well dwight is out
Ally for sotw???????????
Awesome post man!! this is the type of quality i like to see on /r/trees .
You win just by showing up.
the colored mentos do not work well for it. 
Non-mobile: [Perhaps you should get actual facts](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1948_Arab%E2%80%93Israeli_War)  ^I'm ^a ^robot, ^and ^this ^is ^my ^purpose. ^Thank ^you ^for ^all ^the ^kind ^replies! ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble!
3nine send me ur skins bb u'v always been muh favorite &lt;3
Though you put it somewhat harshly, you're right.   Most if not RB fights in a Spittie come out okay if the Spit pilot puts its maneuvrablity to effect. Head-ons with converging wing-mounted weapons are hard to come out of as a victor. 
This is going to be good :D
I completely agree. Just had this conversation with a friend of mine when we were discussing longer films that have recently come out like Boyhood and Interstellar. I would have no problem with an intermission, even a few minutes so I could safely go to the bathroom or something, stretch, etc.
Being sarcastic dickheads and asking for people to leave is easier than doing any type of effort.
( I ain't playing a Warrior, I'm playing  Brewmaster)  Idk what fucking idiot thinks that being at the bottom of the DPS meter, for 80% of the fight (actually boss health), only to smash a single skill in the last 20% that will actually do more dmg than any other single ability you used  is fun game design.  It's actually just fucking retarded.
Proportional representation like the one used in Europe is better and doesn't have this problem. Never going to happen in the good old USSA though.
2002 toyota camry
I think its the lack of accountability let's the socially unacceptable shit to pop up. 
Memory foam? Are they making this for little animals to sleep in? Imagine putting on the slipper and feeling the imprint of an animal in the foam, Creeeeepy.
Yeah man, take it out, it should be fine
chill out, it's just my opinion
[Sunshine - Capa's Jump](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=clG_1sqOsBs) That scene haunted me for weeks after I saw it. 
I. Love. You.
I may be constantly high-fiving you, Canada, but there's a reason we don;t ask you for ideas.
Ahh, makes sense. I've always been taught the opposite to focus on strength the weakest segment of the motion, rather than speed through a sticking point. Ie, if you're weak off the floor, then work on your above-the-knee strength to finish the movement. 
52  Chucklenuts
At least next time you smoke your tolerance shouldn't be as strong. Get high as fuck!
Sesame Street Fighter is a real thing too. Its a typing game!
London, Beijing, Shanghai, Bangkok, Johannesburg, Edinburgh, Cardiff, Paris, Rome, Barcelona
It's so gross I had to search out a better version so we can wash our eyes out.  Here: http://i.imgur.com/teOs6il.gif
This is useless.
TRADABLE!!!
Quadruple parking? You deserve literally everything that anyone does to your car except for actual damage.
they the best man
No, haha I didn't hear anything about rough drafts so apparently not.  
True. Plus HoC has been known to bring back characters after a while (like Gillian, Evelyn, etc)
Where's the "after" picture? 
steam overlay is a 2d layer above the fullscreen 3d and it captures the pixels under it.
One of these is not like the rest... 
http://imgur.com/rN7kHod
People hate on Bilas? He's the best. He knows his shit and can communicate it really well
You could potentially have sites in the brain receiving twice the current level that was being supplied, i.e. if you use 2 stimulators each set at 1 mA some regions could recieve 2 mA. Where this happens is difficult to predict without computer modelling. However (like in that example), if you use standard safety guidelines for tDCS like no more than 2 mA per electrode it seems very unlikely you could get enough "overlap" to really damage any tissue.  A bigger problem here is that you will be stimulating basically most of the brain, and we don't have a clear pciture of what that does. This is *not* hd-tDCS--in HD tDCS you would have either a common cathode and two anodes or a common anode with two cathodes, in both cases with a regulation system that ensures the current is evenly split between electrodes. The difference here is tht nw both "stiimulators" are in the same circuit, so you can make designs to improve focality like the 4x1 layout.
Haha I already have. Not interested and TBH neither am I
A good sharpener can remove,the rust. They have this filler stuff they'll put in afterwards. It's how they can fix gashes in the blade as well
That was surreal. They literally lived in a dump, everything they owned was or was made from trash, yet the people all seemed happy and optimistic 
That's just my thought from experience working at Taco Bell. "I'm saving 400 calories by getting Diet Pepsi instead of regular, so I can have 3 more tacos to make up for it."
I can't stop laughing at this for some reason. Maybe it's your name.  
Dorahn struggles to his feet, sprinting back to Xaarus, shouting, "You will not hurt her!"
[Yeah, end.]
Do we ever get to see her tits or what? The suspense is killing me
Yeah, you like his product. 
I'm assuming they won't work if you don't have the DLCs.
Nice video!  I can see things are moving quickly in VR Chat as there's a few new things I hadn't seen since my last visit.  The direction it's taking now is a straight line toward a ReadyPlayOne-style metaverse, which is awesome. :)  I have to ask -- did you try stepping into one of those pods at Dony's?
Baby wipes for a quick clean up/absorption helps me a lot with the extra fluids after his first orgasm, personally.
I went into this all O_o   and left all -_-
HAPPY NEW..... HYPE?!
Love the last minute chaotic scramble to make changes with the last minute news. Hell ya
But giving them out.
Yes, I have tried using windows phone and it's a mess. Apps, folders and shortcuts are all tiles on the same screen like so much confetti, some labeled, some not- good luck working out what's what. Try to forward a picture received via WhatsApp for instance and you can't- the picture appears in the gallery (app/folder) (helpfully labeled pictures) on the home screen and you get to work from there, cos of course it's really intuitive to go to a completely different app to do that. 
So hot
Yeah that tends to happen when people like you are impervious to facts and go by your feelings instead. You are being played for a fool by a politician. Give me a rational sound argument on this topic. Show cause and effect. Show how Wal-Mart is responsible for anyone's financial situation. Show how Wal-Mart created the conditions in which welfare is doled out. Show why Wal-Mart should pay their employees making almost $12 an hour more while the mom and pop hardware store down the street paying minimum wage shouldnt.   Finally, just for fun, speculate on what would happen if the government didn't subsidize Wal-Mart employees lifestyles? 
Jesus man, my phone is twice that.  Isn't America great?  Somehow Fuck you and go choke on a dick just doesn't cut it talking about the ISPs here.  After you see what they do to consumers it's just so infuriating.  Did you know in South Korea that they pay the equivalent to about $35 a month and get over 1000 mbps down and here I pay over $100 a month for fucking 70 mbps down?  
You could play Natalie Portman's little sister.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=scAK6mikkss
Jeff Beck - Wired, Blow by Blow  Wes Montgomery - Smokin' at the Half Note  Al Di Meola Paco de Lucía and John McLaughlin - Friday Night in San Francisco  Harvey Mandel - Cristo Redentor  Danny Gatton - anything  The Hellecasters - anything
You should take damage from doing front flips in your tank though.  The arcade part of this game keeps it playable but there needs to be some semblance of sim in it.
When I started getting aches and pains. Sadly, I'm 16. :P
Ike, King Dedede, and Meta Knight are only confirmed for a new shipment of them sometime in the upcoming months. They never said that they would be commonly found. Of course, I would love for them to be common, but there is nothing pointing towards that being a fact just yet. Sheik and Diddy Kong were constantly stocked, but a majority of its shipment was delayed (probably due to the port strike issue). If anything, Sonic and Mega Man turned out to be a Sheik / Diddy Kong situation. If Ike, Meta Knight, or King Dedede were in the same situation, we would have seen shipments of them commonly by now.
it probably smells like petrol
Muse eels... muscle kay... mucus milks... mews elks... mused ilks... monkey oils...  You get the picture. Someone should draw all the renditions of Muselk's name. 
Check yo triggers
Fair enough. Realized I sound like a jackass so I'll take it.
Taken on my phone, a nexus 5. 
He's not even close to starter material.  It's shit like this that makes me worry about Yallop's ability as a coach.   
Are you Harold Reynolds?   Think about the logic of a win or a loss. You can pitch 9 innings give up 1 run and lose, you can go 5 innings giving up 10 runs and win. It is not a useful stat.  And despite the Reds winning 90 games, Bailey was in the bottom 10 pitchers in terms of run support. 
This is what I don't like about most sampler packs: They give you the most uncommon/expensive/unusual blades from god knows where that you'll never buy.  PM me your address and I'll send you some blades that are easy to find on ebay, work great, and are cheap by the 100's.
Sorry, not interested in separating it
/r/teslore already ripped their dicks off so they could shove them up their own butts as Kirkbride requested.
What's up with the gap from 67' to 88' though... Didn't anyone write anything good then?
Those smiles were pretty cool. 
wow, miler won something? well, iluminati
Leider nein. Die Abitur heißt der Leaving Certificate hier in Irland.
Thanks for your help! 
And give you advantage.
Hope you are joking. It's not easy negotiating with media companies.
I don't even...
[Big popper pap?](https://cdn0.vox-cdn.com/uploads/chorus_asset/file/3365536/scott-steiner-2011-hq-png-render-wid-tna.0.jpg)
I bought some pre-made stringers and found them to be sub-par.  The next set of stairs I just cut myself, it was a lot easier than people make it out to be, as long as you follow the old adage of "measure twice, cut once" and plan them out.
no, Tec-9 op.
You're sure it got sniped? I still see it deposited.
A 1990's Ford Mustang, gross.
You're right - that's true. But that doesn't mean Valve casual has an excuse to be totally useless, right?
Any post or comment by an account that is less than 28 days will be reviewed by a moderator.  **Please remember to review the [Subreddit Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/MCSPlaystation/wiki/mcsrules), as well as the [Ways to Stay Safe](http://www.reddit.com/r/MCSPlaystation/wiki/waystostaysafe) wiki, and the [How to Identify Scammers](http://www.reddit.com/r/MCSPlaystation/wiki/howtoidentifyscammers) wiki.**   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMCSPlaystation) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Islam is undeniably a religion of violence. Muslims who disagree either disagree with their own religion and so shouldn't follow it, or do agree that it is an ideology of hate and intolerance and so shouldn't follow it.
This same idiot said the greatest foreign policy achievement he's seen in his lifetime is when Reagan fired air traffic controllers in 1981....  what the fuck?
dotabuff ?
Agree 
No. 
Hello, as per rule [**9: No Bug &amp; Technical issue posts**] on this subreddit, this post has been removed.   On our sidebar (---&gt;) we have a Bugs and Troubleshooting section. Hi-Rez have a [support page] (http://www2.hirezstudios.com/smite/nav/comm/support) where you can look up and report problems. You can also try posting your question on the official  forums [\(they have a bug and support section)](http://forums.smitegame.com/forumdisplay.php?226-PC-Support) or contacting Hi-Rez directly with your issues. Good luck!
No,  The question is, did he present my offer in a fair and balanced manner? He knew everything about our financial position and what we were capable of doing or not doing. Was there any personal bias towards presenting the offer? Did he disclose any information that he should not have? Also, when he suddenly decided to stop being our agent, was he really acting in our best interest? He did not even  make a recommendation or referral. He just tossed us aside like we were garbage. We had to practically plead with him just to get more information about how things would play out. And even after talking with 2 other agents about the situation, his decision to back out made no sense unless he was afraid that he would get caught with his hand in the cookie jar for doing something wrong. Is it not normal to ask the realtor how they would act in our best interest if they are playing both sides?   Agent3 thinks that Agent1 is unethical - which is why he had the grudge. It wasn't because he slept with his wife or something. He informed me that all reputable agents in the area choose to avoid working with him. He did not give specific examples.   Edit: Also my current agent made the suggestion of at least contacting his broker. Aside from her duty to me, she has no personal feelings about the situation. She just thought it might be something worth looking into because of how he handled the situation.   I don't want to sue anyone, but I also don't want to just give up on the house living the next few years in regret.
Try going to Wal-Mart to by your wife female hygiene products,  and have your cashier be a former student. 
Oh no! I wouldn't give up hope. Just today I got a petite size of a J.Crew bridesmaid dress, in a color from several seasons ago, new on eBay for only $60. If it helps you, they run a little big so you could size down by a half.
Yes, you keep repeating the poor people shtick. I get it. But at some point a city is too spread out to make PT economical.  Keep in mind I'm talking about rail. Local buses usually make sense in most major cities. But rail in L.A. is fucking retarded.
Your post/comment has been removed because your Friend Code and In-Game Name have not been properly set. [You **must** visit this link to set your flair text before you can post on the subreddit.](http://porygon.co/)  Please note that it can take up to 10 minutes for the bot to set your flair.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpokemontrades) if you have any questions or concerns.*
giant robot from factorization? wtf? Could i see a screenshot, now I'm interested
Kakor kan inte twittra. 
for reals
Why not? This is basically anarchy red and we still have to deal with getting democracy(let's face it, victory road and seafoam are going to screw us over).
Make sure your get the Car Fax or Auto check  and always ask for a discount the posted number is almost never the bottom line. Make sure you love the car it is our job to sell you something and get you really hyped about it. You don't want to be upset you bought it after a couple of weeks.
Cant scroll to the right and see all the talents. Using Android 5.0 and 1920x1080 screen
SCREW YOU
That would be *the cutest* bohemianish thing. But alas we're both kind of really into the idea of wearing a dress so it will end up more like [this other image](http://i.imgur.com/Sd1oSqk.jpg) of that dress.
Top three posts almost every day seem to just be joke threads. I haven't gotten into a nice good heated debate in like 3 days :/ I want people to enjoy their time here, but how many joke threads can a sub like? 
I would go for the underground, unsigned hip hop artists. I'll keep u in mind. 
Brewer is terrible, you must have mistaken him with someone else.
&gt; I'm going to mention one pro that people don't seem to be bringing up, well...sorta. The armor is good, but the more important thing is that the effectiveness of the armor is significantly higher when you're playing against worse players. You can say this for almost any tank's armor, but it's perfectly exemplified with the IS-7. I had to pound it into people's heads that a lot of IS-7s in clan wars only works against shit clans, and I was proven right over and over and over again but people refused to listen to me.  Back when I was in BADGR there were a few battles where we lost to teams we shouldn't have and I remember IS-7s just getting obliterated in a split second against not great players (and they were being driven by very good players).  I started taking screenshots of every tank in the after battle report in CWs and SHs.  I recently went back and started crunching the numbers.  I put in all the numbers for IS-7s and E 100s and they ended up with the same number of bounced shots per game (1.8).  Didn't really surprise me.  It's seemed clear for a while that in an environment with all gold rounds flying around armor is largely meaningless and having more hps is what really matters (for survivability).
Doubt it. So it's all up to our persistence to safely drop off one mon~ :3
Amateur audio engineering. To have a decent setup you can expect an initial investment of a few thousand dollars which will get you an audio interface, cables, a microphone or two, and a digital audio workstation. That will allow you to record about one instrument at a time. If you want virtual instruments, expect to pay about $500 for a somewhat decent library, and then you need a MIDI keyboard or external controller to play them with. Then if you need effects for processing your signals you pay more, and if you need decent preamps you pay more, better microphones, better interface... and so on. Once you get to a certain point you have to consider having a dedicated space to record, and that means adding acoustic treatment for the room. To have enough equipment to record a 4-5 piece band with professional gear will set you back over $100,000. 
where da melph at?
An IPA, Saison, or Stout. Preferably from a local brewery.  Gin with grapefruit, or even better, something with Mezcal. Or if the cocktail list isn't great, I'll do a bourbon.   Tempranillo or Pinot Noir if wine makes sense. I rarely order wine on dates for fear of turning my lips purple, or spilling on myself.
"Gold diggers have 1 client" - A. Philosopher 
i am literally never satisfied with my wicking.  cleaning out a mod, setting up some new coils, getting them firing perfectly? that shit is fucking zen as heck. i do it to just chillout some nights even when i dont need to rebuild whatsoever.
Yeah that was funny
I sure hope so!
I mean, if people end up downvoting based on flairs, it's gonna be because of posters like that... Damn I hate victimizers.
I'm not sure which way is up anymore
Start wide wide wide then hone in on more detail.  i.e. crap out a super duper rough outline  then a super rough outline  then a rough outline  then a more detailed outline  then write the damn thing  If you can't get past the super duper rough outline, then I don't know what to tell you.
I believe [redmercy](http://www.twitch.tv/redmercylol/v/3842702) plays also plays a bit of yasuo.
U wot m8
Yup... asexual not for the win. I can appreciate nice, sexy things but that's as far as it gets with my annoying brain.
The Vikings are bad. 
I name the alien Felipe, very fun game, but fuck the androids sry
Two Adam K &amp; Soha mentions in here, as a long time progressive fan (a Canadian one, at that) it is kind of nice to see :)
I want this as my buffering thing
How long in advance did you plan it out?   Was the overall content in each separate story planned beforehand, or made up as it went along?   How many eggs would be in your ideal omelet? 
Could you add real ladders instead of teleporting? or no.
That same thing happens now... Except you replace the RoRG with a better RoRG. Or you never replace the first one you got. Your "problem" would be a brand new "problem", one that still makes you more powerful than the current situation because you wouldn't have to waste a valuable ring slot with a shitty RoRG.
Congrats!!!
That's some sweet fried ice cream! 
Sure!
You do. *he cups your cheek, stroking it with his thumb*
Nice try NSA!
You don't know anyone else with a vape you can try? Something about what you're saying just sounds wrong, as if your vape is not working or something.
It's pretty clear cut why this is one of the worst tifos ever made (no bias)  &gt; Oceania trophy with cobwebs.  Last time I checked, Sydney have more trophies than WSW in their cabinet.  &gt; Del Piero/Italy banner.  Would've made more sense to have an Austrian flag, no?  &gt; Your smurf village getting painted red &amp; black.  The opposite of that happened last night.  &gt; The reference back to the "West is geography. Sydney is a state of mind" (to this day I'm waiting for an explanation after asking a few people) tifo.  The reason nobody has explained it to you is because the tifo is pretty self explanatory in the first place. I love that the RBB response is to reply with a tifo that makes no sense and then start with the "yeah your tifo didn't make any sense either that's the point".  But you want to know my favourite part of the tifo?   Every time the derby at SFS starts I see a torrent of WSW fans saying our tifos are shit because they aren't related to our team. Because RBB tifos are always about the Wanderers and not about themselves, right? This time it wasn't either.  In the end I'm not going to remember the tifo nearly as much as Antonis crushing the hopes of every Wanderer in Sydney.   I'll go grab some popcorn while you write your response.
They were stored in a temperature and humidity controlled closet for the last several years. But not sure before that (weren't my bottles). 
Lineups are out:   [Union](https://twitter.com/PhilaUnion/status/571820423316418560)  [Red Bull](https://twitter.com/NewYorkRedBulls/status/571816215590539265)
Independence sure. But what is this personal branding bullshit?  
Tristam LP  Oh wait...
And so were those fabulous uniforms!
gg
I believe the last time this was posted, it was debunked because it is part of a film they show for Driver's Education. 
Wait, does that count?
I don't get it! Yes, I'm bad! Please help.
I'm not a regular tumblr user but I mainly use it for exactly the same reason. Seeing new pics/quotes/gifs/videos of her, seeing funny posts, etc. It really annoys me to see so many people spam her @ to get noticed, getting messages asking to reblog their petition to get noticed, etc. 
cowboy fan. fixed it
I read that PIA  is good. 
En pizza utan ost är fan ingen pizza alls!
Cheer up! You have a good chance at McDavid and if not him one of the other fantastic prospects this year.
online now :)
American burritos are better than Mexican burritos. Mexican burritos are like a couple ingredients, American burritos are like everything.
no issues, I still highly recommend Yardley lavender talcum powder. or their new citrus and wood is quite nice as well.
Women have done well in higher learning the last few years. 
u famous now
Here is not a FinFet works.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Jctk0DI7YP8
So you do not have a QCK for sale?
The only difference here is that German writing conventions don't call for using spaces, where English conventions do. It's a superficial difference. The linguistic process at work here is the same.
Would Dr. Seuss land have something like this on the wall of a gift shop? That seems very unlikely. 
(Back. :3) Rush: \*waits for class to start\* Ajani: \*walks in\* Alright class I shall be your teacher for basic combat. You may call me Mr. Goldmane. Teiros: No clue. Throdder: \*cuddles and nuzzles our noses\*
no, it's horrible.
&gt; That's what I mean by unreliable.  So why we can't have anarchism because of human nature?
But no scumming deathcam 
Namesirish13
People are really stupid.
Can you explain how it makes sense?
PM'd
I can relate for sure, I had the same notion about myself recently. The rewrites and edits come in once you have actual material to edit. Sometimes I'll get ahead of myself and try to make rewrites or edits before I even I have the project done! Well put OP 
Hello, my name is Hanad, a.k.a Magma. I'm a gamer that really likes to play games and listen to most types of Electronic music, and of course I'm a fan of Monstercat!  1. Where I live: Norway  2. Favorite Sports Team: I'm not a sporty guy  3. Favorite Video Games: Minecraft, CS:GO, Cities in Motion 2 and more  4. Most Prized Possession: When I discovered Electronic music and stopped listening to Hip-Hop/Rap in 2011.  5. Best Childhood Memory: Nothing.  6. Best Skills/Talents: Err, what?  7. Relationship Status: I have always been Single 8. Worst Life Moment: When I feel like a piece of shit and have bad thoughts on my mind.  9. What I want to be when I grow up: Do something about computers, like bulid PC parts.
I live in lancaster so i most certainly would.
did he post a picture of his mom?
So that means we're winning the next 5 superbowls or winning the next 55 superbowls?
Voting with your wallet is great! Do that! But don't actively wish for the companies financial demise. That's where I have issues 
*She raises one back.*
It's been a week since the timer started and no one knows what it means. Theories such as the End of the World or a Government Hoax have swept the media. When it first appeared it said 1Wk which clearly ment one week. It is now only 2 minutes from ending. People every where are converting to religions or acting like its the end of the world. Shops have closed down, people lie dead after global panic lead to riots and bad hygiene due to everyone quitting there jobs. The world has turned to Anarchy, with hardly any governments with actually power. No laws has lead to mass killings, fires, explosions, and many other things from this chaos. There's only 10 secondary left now and I am just lying here. Waiting. 9, 8, 7, 6, 5, 4, 3, 2, 1. Silence everywhere. Nothing happened. The timer is gone. People realise that the timer ment nothing. They look around and see the chaos this has caused. All of it in vain. Why had they let this happen? Only time will tell if the human race ever manages to get back to "normal".  (Sry 4 grammar)
His agent has an argument and he expresses possible intentions to make a fresh start somewhere else. That's being a diva? I think fans are just mad he was suspended for a year and wants to leave. Neither of those actions express a disrespect or avoidance of responsibility. He took all the responsibility he needed to in court, he's not required to pander to fans or the team.
We've made 19 field goals--and have the lead.
Your post has been removed as it either violated [Rule 1 ](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-) or [Rule 2](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_2-). Please check that your post doesn't contain the following issues:  * **Your own answer to the question goes in the comments as a reply to your own post.  Your post will not be approved unless your own answer is removed from the text box.**  * **You must post a clear and direct question, and only the question, in your title.**  * **Your post can't be specific to your situation or involve a story. Please make sure to depersonalize your question and remove any unnecessary context before posting it again.**  Use the text box to explain your question if necessary (adding context or conditions), but do not use it to share an answer, add unnecessary context to the question or include your personal story. As the submitter, any answers or stories go in the comments section as a reply to the post. This is to allow for users to distinguish between the question being asked, and the submitter's answer, when voting.  Please note - once posted, the titles cannot be edited. If your title breaks the rules, please feel free to make a new post that fits within the rules.  [**When you've removed the answer or unnecessary context from the textbox, message the mods for review and reapproval**](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;amp;subject=Post Review Request&amp;amp;message=My post was removed under rule 1, please review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2xiem8/my_friend_is_grieving_what_should_i_do/) and ask the moderators to re-approve it.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
install malwarebytes it's free, it's probably not "hacking" rather a virus  nothing to get too worried about, hopefully malwarebytes can get rid of it
Sorry, but I had to remove your recent post on /r/dirtykikpals because your title did not comply with our official guidelines.   This is the proper way to format a title: *AGE [R4R] DESCRIPTION*  Here is a TL;DR checklist of what should be in your subject:  **1. Use only M, F, T, and R for tagging gender.**  **2. Use [] around the R4R tag, so it looks like [R4R]. Don't use (), {}, or anything else.**  **3. For multiple ages or letter tags, only use /'s, so it looks like 21/21 [MF4R]. Don't use . , \\ | - : ; ~ or anything else.**  **4. Your age must be included before your [R4R].**   Finally, please make sure you read the rules on the sidebar!   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdirtykikpals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
great showing for skdc in the first map
Imo, I'm not very hyped for FNaF3, but I am eagerly awaiting its arrival.
No, we can't offer a diagnosis, but planting the seed that it could easily be mental health related (and it definitely could) might be enough to persuade op to get a professional to address it.  You'll never get a diagnosis if you don't actually see a practitioner, and no one does that unless they thI k there might be something wrong.
Fuck. You got me
A little romance could work as a mini arc (eg. the teacher goes on a date and the girls try to help).  Sidenote, just woke up, thanks for the read, K-On is the best way to start the day.  [and cheers for the gifs I was missing.](http://i.imgur.com/237YKkN.gif)
Is she whistling a haunting melody?
you're awesome.  thanks so much!
The thirst that we suffered from the past few months are getting quenched! 
Protip: Dock all your ships smaller than a frigate in the mothership.
I am working on getting signed documents but I won't have them in time for closing at the end of the month.
This, and the endless pointless shit like describing the contents of a pencil case, mean that even if you do a language GCSE its pretty much pointless. Then there's a massive step up to A-Level so of the few people that take one, many drop out.  My old school, even though it was a grammar school and supposedly a language college, had probably 15-20 people out of 200 actually do a language A2.
I can't wait! I hear Rogen and Fassbender are great, Woz himself endorsed Rogen. Boyle has proven himself a competent director and I look up to Sorkin. I love film, business and the work of Aaron Sorkin, so this looks right up my alley. Please don't disapoint Sorkin, I love The Social Network, Moneyball and the Newsroom. I'll do everything in my ability to see this opening night, or before! :)
Knowing nothing about your game, the first thing that comes to mind is a simple Django or Flask site where you can post and save to a database and request/return high scores. Or, you could just use a cloud based database like Amazon RDS, and have the game access it directly. 
No, that was never said.  But I'll eat my hat if that wasn't the reason.  EDIT: I'm a man of my word.  http://imgur.com/nmxcBS3
Bae caught me sleepin' was the first i believe.  It was a picture of a girl who clearly took a picture of herself, as seen with the mirror behind her. She claimed that her boyfriend took the picture.
Meatspace cake day week!
No he wasn't, please do some research on it. 
I don't really like Obsidian Shard as an item. It's like a worse Titan's Bane in my opinion. Doesn't effect towers like titan's does and the passive is near useless unless a lot of people build a lot of magic defense. Voidstone + dark stance 2 gets rid of 40 protections and that's basically true damage to the jungler, mid, adc, and maybe solo depending on who it is. More pen is unnecessary. The instant 15% of their hp gone helps when fighting gods with a lot of HP but few protections E.G. most mages that build warlocks. Soul Reaver also gives you more MP than Obsidian Shard and an extra 300 mana. Extra mana is always nice on hel, you run out fast.   All that being said, I don't buy Soul Reaver very often, it's more situational. Only when they have high HP with low protections. I may get obsidian shard if they have a tanky team, but I don't like to. Something like, Osiris jungle, Hades solo, Zhong Kui Mid, adc whatever, and support whatever.
Pretty sexy ty
Oh my goodness I didn't even notice that
Seems irrelevant, seeing as it has nothing to do with this. 
Halozy and Tatsh
[Like this?](https://www.decalgirl.com/skins/249428/Nintendo-3DS-LL-Skin-Retro-Horizontal)
156
焦土とかどこの田舎だよ
The systems here have an indicator light to make it even simpler. If it's solid, your direction triggered it, if it's flashing, a different direction triggered it.   And just think, just those 2 crashes probably would've paid for their portion of the cost anyway! 
On my first run through, I did only the unofficial patch and some graphics mods, due to some of the characters looking dorky xD
Your TSV is **2779** for a Pokemon with TID 15609 and OT Hailey.  I don't know why you deleted your comment...
No shame
What?!  I bet it was like the Punk Chicago shirts and they're only selling them there.  I will buy one the second it goes up on wweshop of it ever does.  I love how the design evokes his bandana.  Its really amazing.
It's in Quebec, Canada - the adult education sector here is the same provincial government run organisation as the public school system and is quite legit. :)  Quick edit: Good job, OP!
Service Manual. That and of course the internet. Dont be afraid to fix it yourself, and if you get stuck there are always forums and such that can help you out. Having friends around to help that are mechanically inclined does help as well if you arent that good for a wrench.   That and having the right tools always helps.
Happus Dydd Gŵyl Dewi!
I just picked up some of these today, not too bad.
HOW DARE YOU CAUSE A MUTINY ON MY SHIP.  Guards! Seize him!
It will be difficult (impossible?) for you to earn 7-12% on bonds after accounting for defaults. Those interest rates are basically junk bond rates and so at the very least you should have a huge amount of diversity for your investments which means using a junk bond fund rather than buying the individual bonds yourself.   On the other hand, high return bonds are more sensitive to interest-rate risk for the same duration, so your holdings in both funds and individual bonds will either be exposed to significant interest-rate risk or have a reduced return by targeting shorter duration bonds. Holding individual bonds to maturity can mitigate this risk (but not the lost opportunity cost), but is harder to diversify the individual company risk without a very large account. Of course, this is just for anyone else reading this because you should already be aware of these trade-offs and pitfalls if you are planning such an investment (if not, seriously reconsider your investment strategy).  One alternative could be peer-to-peer lending which can provide returns within that range before defaults and at the lower end of that range after accounting for them. Sites like Prosper let you diversify with amounts as small as $25/loan, and thus diversify your account with much smaller amounts of capital. Just keep in mind that both p2p lending and junk bonds should be expected to be “front loaded” with higher returns during good times, but *very significant* declines and defaults during economic downturns.
*Edit: * ***sigh*** Nevermind  &gt; IF it was my kid though that he did this to though... Then I probably would be the guy who hit him with the shovel and recorded it. But that's not the situation
Not to mention, David Brooks found Wayne's increasing *enthusiasm* for killing to be relevant enough to put it in his official written confession.   David's actions and attitude during the murders tell me that he wasn't into killing. He's terrible, a monster responsible for the deaths of dozens of young men. Despite that, he was clearly not a person who enjoyed killing.   [The same thing cannot be said about Wayne.](https://www.reddit.com/r/serialkillers/comments/2xcvjh/serial_killers_youve_never_heard_of/cozp1yx?context=1)
Nope, but I used to file photos with a SORA level. :-(
In my experience, yeah. 
A budding engineer who thinks that *math is hard* doesn't seem that uncommon.
Did you coat it with #aggietears?
See ya later then!  Also, Smith is obviously the most complete back in Dallas history. 
I get the same welts, although for not quite as long.  For me, switching to the enanthate with the different preservative did nothing to change the reaction, but I'm really glad it worked for you.  Not trying to discount your experience, just throwing mine out there as well.  
The leaderboard will turn into a pay to win place.
Dank memes.
Quelaag, Bell Gargoyles. 
Still there. Likely it'll stick around for a while longer.
Alright who said no.
Maus? I truly didnt know, it was a guess.
You'll have to speak up, I'm wearing a towel.
I know. But what I'm saying is the govt listens to everything. They will know the passwords and they will know the BC numbers.
I played the whole side several times and even timed the chord. I definitely knew it was different and innovative even though I wasn't sophisticated enough to know why.  Much like when I was 7 and heard 'All My Loving' on Ed Sullivan and it totally blew my naive little mind.
Assuming your family doesn't count, good night kisses and such...  A little blonde girl when I was 3-4 years old, haven't seen her in decades and working my current job.   Could be worse, a lot worse if family counts.
[What about the other athletes?](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=k_tO8jOozaU&amp;feature=youtu.be)
the mau5
This could mean that most Starks that are women get married off... Or that because of the Rebellion, Ned Broke Tradition. Ned had to come from somewhere... I wonder if his mother is in the Crypts.
It ensues. Not insue or yncue. ensue 
The camera doesn't move when you give the Rift to your friends. Also you should be changing their height and IPD in the configuration every time you show it to someone.
I'm not even anticipating the next book coming out. So if does get announced, it's win win for me!
Lel.
Who cares?
I say things like: "be careful, someone less understanding than me may take that as salt."
18
subjecting all Apple proprietary code to a process of public peer review coupled with a regular independent security auditing would be a good start.
Prisons may not be handing them out, but prisons in video games are. Try that approach, they're probably better anyway because fantasy, and no real worry about finances.
What bald spot?
Lets go HAWKS!!!!
I run a 50 mm f/1.8 Nikon Ai-S lens on my 600d and it works perfectly, the build quality and glass seems much better than the newer equivalents, also saves you quite a bit of money. 
High fucking five to whoever requested this.
STTGL is an amazingly huge (52.8 billion lightyears tall) brawler capable of fighting at ridiculous multiples of lightspeed and boosting it's own power by orders of magnitude. In it's previous form, TTGL, it was less than 1/5000th the size of STTGL and still tanked/absorbed a multi-galactic attack. It is made out of pure energy, like a solid flame. It is stated that a lower version of GL had probability manipulation.  Galactus is more implied than most things...I know he has galaxy-level feats and the largest amount of Power Cosmic (which ain't nothing to fuck with), but he doesn't have a lot of showings.  Who do I believe wins this? Galactus in my heart. But STTGL in my head.  EDIT: people ITT need to stop wanking STTGL with no-limits nonsense.
So scarcity is just a myth so they can charge more. Then why don't they actually sell their highest speed? They're still allowed to charge whatever they want, so why don't they charge an arm and a leg for the fastest service? 10 gbps isn't even on the market.   It'd take an unbelievable amount of collusion to keep speeds *1,000* times slower than they could sell.  OPEC doesn't charge 1,000 times more for oil than others.
An asshole 
I wonder if that grade inflation leads to blowjobs too :p
This post is trying way too hard. 
All names were once not already taken at one point.
these freckled beans are TOO MUCH for me
Not sure, but I have you tagged as "shitposter"! But, I don't remember why. It was probably due to overly negative rhetoric.
It is not, I saw it with my own eyes and know the person who sew it, the idea was that they put a bull elephant in a dominant post but elephants are matriacrchys.  Edit: It is the museum of natural history in Gothenburg, Sweden. The mastersprogram International Museum Studies did an exhibition project in 2011 where we were told to "hack the museum",  we descided to do an exhibtion about how gender matters, and since they pose a bull elephant in a super dominant posiotion despite the fact that they are matriarys we de descided to put it in a female item of clothing.  EDIT 2: In order to stay true to  Gothenurg humor we descided that in order to get a tilte that shows that it is both about how gender matters and also about matters about genders it was called Gender Matteers, ask any swede about Gothenburg and they will use the word "pun" as one of thier first 20 words =)  Foror more photos check out https://www.flickr.com/photos/gendermatters/sets/72157626733412131/
&gt; The gear is stupid, it is,  But it isn't...and the **opinion** that it's stupid is an **opinion** held by a vocal minority who shouldn't have their emotional needs catered to on a whim. Plenty of people don't get upset by the pants.  I agree with you on the shirts though, for years they've totally failed to provide merchandise that appeals to fan demographics, and instead we get homogenised shit that comes in both child sizes and adult sizes but which adults would be hesitant to wear in public.  That said, there have been promising signs from the merch, they're upping their game with the new DB and NXT shirts that look like they're actually designed for the 18-35 males who want them.
Real men always seemed kinda gay to me. Big hairy chested, sweaty bears spending all their time hanging out with other big sweaty guys, sometimes 'wrestling'.  I'd prefer to be one of those fags who always hangs around supermodels. [Chicks dig gay guys.](http://youtu.be/QJk-XspPDUU)
It doesn't matter that the events are over or that one is shiny. Both events were farmed to hell and back; Beldum rates are a fraction of a comp shiny, and I think Pumpkaboo rates are too.  You might get a Darkrai code if you manage to be one of the first to jump on someone who doesn't know or care about rates, but the people who would make deals like that for PCMT Pokemon don't come here. They're probably all on Japanese boards. On this board, not many people live in Tokyo, and the PCMT supply came from people who charged 30 bucks a pair.
he hath inherited the mantle of Avenger.  All hail Avenger.
[Meta] I will try finding it myself then. Thanks for the help.
Not without a time machine- They closed last year.
They are not nearly as exciting as boss fighting. :D   The creative one is I've always been a low-level musician and I enjoy writing and recording songs. It comes and goes, and in fact is one of my self-indicators when a depressive bout is present in that I don't play or record at all during that time.   Other than that I am a bit of an information junkie and am addicted to Internet news sources and such (like Reddit now). I also now reside in a very rural area and I try to routinely take walks and just enjoy the simple beauty of the world around me. Sad to say walking also comes and goes, despite knowing it's a very positive influence on my mental health.  I also somewhat look after some others in the area that need assistance. Nothing high level, just making life easier for feral cats, birds and the odd elderly or debilitated person.   I'm far from busy because I've whittled a lot of stress and responsibility out of my life but I still try to stay somewhat engaged in the world. I got very, very lucky and found a job I wasn't looking for that takes care of many of my basic needs and allows me a lot of freedom to be a non-traditional worker. I have projects that I do that don't require regular office hours, I mostly work at home and as long as I meet the deadlines I'm not held to any schedule.   It's sort of a depressed person's paradise, except I still suffer from depression so I don't appreciate it as much as I should or could. I've settled for a simple life straddling the poverty line but it works for me. I'll never be thanked in any Oscar speeches but I feel a measure of pride and accomplishment that I am affecting my little part of the world in a positive way.
That's ridiculous. 2 months later? How has nobody bought them out yet? I know sprint did in Missouri but still, I have never been happy with uscc. Phone selection pretty much sucks, late updates and crappy coverage. 
good work! half marathons are no joke!
Episode One:  Winner: Lineysha Sparx  Bottom Two: Serena Cha Cha and Penny Tration  Episode Two:  Winner: Ivy Winters (If only for that runway)  Bottom Two: Serena Cha Cha and Monica Beverly Hillz  Episode Three:  Winner: Jinkx Monsoon  Bottom Two: Monica Beverly Hillz and Coco Montrese  Episode Four:   Winner: Ivy Winters  Bottom Two: Honey Mahogany and Jade Jolie  Episode Five:   Winner: Jinkx Monsoon  Bottom Two: Detox and Lineysha Sparx  Episode Six:   Winner: Ivy Winters  Bottom Two: Jade Jolie and Coco Montrese  Episode Seven:   Winner: Coco Montrese  Bottom Two: Alyssa Edwards and Roxxxy Andrews  Episode Eight:  Winner: Alaska  Bottom Two: Ivy Winters and Alyssa Edwards  Episode Nine:  Winner: Jinkx Monsoon  Bottom Two: Detox and Alyssa Edwards  Episode Ten:   Winner: Roxxxy Andrews  Bottom Two: Coco Montrese and Detox  Episode Eleven:   Winner: Roxxxy Andrews  Bottom Two: Jinkx Monsoon and Detox
Looks like op is a freshman in college
[How did I know this would happen?](https://imgflip.com/i/i9iaa) 
This guy sounds like a prick. He has a girlfriend and he's still trying to hook up you you? That's horrible. I feel sorry for his poor girlfriend.   But, that being said, you really should not be cuddling and kissing him. You're leading him on, when you know he has a girlfriend. Why are you doing that?   You've said that you know he wouldn't want to date you, so putting yourself in that position is just going to make it harder for yourself in the long run, because you're not going to get what you want by giving him what he wants. You said it so yourself, he's using you.   I've been in a similar position where I was constantly trying to be with a guy who didn't want to date me. It would always end with me wondering why I wasn't good enough for them. Don't let that happen to you. You deserve better.   Stop putting yourself in the same situation, and if you don't trust yourself, stop being friends with him. 
[Hunter's Guile](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Handlers/Image.ashx?name=Ranger%27s%20Guile&amp;type=card&amp;.jpg) - [Gatherer](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Ranger%27s%20Guile), [MC](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Ranger%27s%20Guile), [($)](http://www.mtgprice.com/search?search=Ranger%27s%20Guile)   ^^^[[cardname]] ^^^to ^^^call ^^^- **^^^not ^^^on ^^^gatherer ^^^= ^^^not ^^^fetchable**
The only way that this could be better is if I was actually cumming. Sunday has never seemed so very far away.
Agree. I think it may have been a botched robbery. I'll make another post on /r/london when these criminals are identified or charged.
&gt; the downward spiral that Syriza's government triggered on Greece  I was not aware that Syriza governed Greece for the last ten years.
Disarm Loki with the augment mod made it pretty easy for me and we had an ash who killed everything.
I love hearing that.  We decided on Naxos for 4 days.  Still deciding on the other island for 2 nights.  Thinking maybe Mykanos.
'Could' and 'should' are two totally different concepts all together. How important was this mission? Brunch? Nah, take the safe route and return home.
It's probably a reaction to how overt homophobia is becoming less socially acceptable. The same thing is happening with some racist groups. They're trying to pretend as if they don't hate other races; they want you to think they're just pro-white. 
That new Kinja shit. Yeah, it's simple, but it looks like a plain old wordpress blog. Their categorization model is shit too.
For a person who claims he pulled a NTL, this team kinda sucks, not going to lie.
**Background check for /u/suchlist:**  ---   Age:        10 months 29 days  Karma:         306  Verified Email:      false  Flair:         none  Could be Impersonating:    ---  Banned:        false  Doge sub activity:      low ---  In case you are a new user, please take a look in our [wiki](/r/dogemarket/wiki/) to get acquainted with the [rules](/r/dogemarket/wiki/index#wiki_rules). There are also many helpful tips for [staying safe](/r/dogemarket/wiki/index#wiki_how_to_stay_safe) on your journey to the moon!  If you have questions regarding /u/SuchModBot or general questions regarding this sub, please [message the mods](http://reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fdogemarket)!
I've got the cam and the upgrade lens. Both spawned day 1 of the patch.
Cheaper then importing a bottle from out of country by a pretty large order of magnitude. It's also easy as hell to suspend. 
This lad has done more for the country than a politician. 
That other guys has quite the Gen-5 love.  I was pretty impressed by the OHTK against the Kyruem-black too! Durant FTW
King_Smithy_x3
若手作家も絵をカコうとしたカイガあったもんだ
Predictions: Shades of Cool and West Coast for sure.   I'd love it if she sang Brooklyn Baby.
So did I.  Thought it was about tube tops.
Your post has been removed because your account is very new. Please wait a week before posting. ---  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FPS4) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Added you and hopping online
The Simpsons
Married to a current prom dress model and working at a gym,  basically living the life, I'll take it. 
Right, but I was sharing another example like what /u/nog1518 said with Nady
So everyone in my department has a hard time getting along with him because we're all just like him? 
Lake Placid is a great one.. rivers and swamps. Dagon is a good Cthulu mythos along the sea.
fun?
frank
funny how the yanks had no issues with cronies stuffing their pockets when they had a perpetually pissed weakling in their pocket running things.
I don't understand how a person can not know about the concept of individual leaves, even if they can't see them. Don't they learn about leaves in school? Don't they feel them falling during autumn? 
sweet bike brodude
this america we can eat what ever we want racist 
Like brand new desks for the SOR to replace the ones they had since last year?!!
Because dist-upgrade
Looked to me like theres nothing left to do except hit the gym. Great swing, I would imagine you score quite well?
I have been working on a multiplier machine but the duplicates always seem to come out a little dumber and less attractive so maybe we should until I get the kinks worked out.
75% pear by volume. 
Not a good idea. If this is a true allergy, repeated exposures can lead to worsening reactions. (Like anaphylactic shock.) 
Ugh I was taught this too and turns out I have a higher sex drive than my husband. Maybe because he was never forced into the purity movement? This causes problems.
dat french
Am I the only one that poops without a phone? some of the best shower thoughts come while shitting
ah okay cool  might have to try this on my White playthru  edit: okay I already have two pokemon in white (only played it for about an hour)  So I rerolled until it reflected what I have so far  Starter: Tepig (Fire)  1 Grass (I have that pokemon that looks like a piece of broccoli)  2 Flying  3 Flying  4 Water  5 Psychic  6 Rock  So I'll probably use my Tepig in a flying slot until I can get two flying types. 
So you're asexual , that's fine. As long as you understand you're in the extreme minority. Also, there's a difference between "fucking bitches high five man" and having a deeply intimate, passionate love making
Tiny Zeus Lister
Read the side bar and read Models By Mark Manson READ MODELS BY MARK MANSON
yea there's 2 items that actually let you show it off by hiding the armor. One makes it only visible to yourself, the other makes it visible to everyone. I think you get it with federation bills that you get for logging in daily. Idk though, I don't care for it lol.
Thanks I'll check em out
Norway is feeling a little stabby compared to all of their neighbors
If you're just guessing what you think might be true then you really shouldn't speak on the matter.   The Warrior Community as a whole hates the current Arms and they have since the moment they started removing abilities in the WoD beta.  Warriors have been telling Blizzard how much they dislike it but they won't listen.
With your finger   (No but seriously just hold it however feels right)
Thank you for subscribing to Fun Cat Facts! Here is a fun fact about cats:  &gt;Cats who eat too much tuna can become addicted, which can actually cause a Vitamin E deficiency.
I just assume England aren't doing to well and stick to the boxing.
No, it literally doesn't state that. 
How long did it take to find your home?
I always had a problem rerolling everytime, i coudn't continue one character. So the best map i knew was the secret map behind the flower to get to the hidden ribbon pig.  Oh my god, the time that i spend there ! And those music, everytime i hear a soundtrack of maplestory i get so nostalgic, it's unbelievable
That's exactly why. Where did I "talk down" to someone explicitly for disagreeing with me? Everyone's entitled to their opinion just not ignorance. For someone with such a strong lack of reading comprehension I wouldn't expect you to distinguish the difference. Clearly some of you don't live in the real world.
KKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKK
Doesn't the lack of contrast on the menu bar hurt?
Red Tiger M40A3 was my shit.  The G3 too.ah the memories
Pickles will prevail!
Add me. TransporterBear. (X360)
his numbers with Hillen are atrocious defensively. Hillen was a liability
Except there was no real reason to think this would have an effect on people's approval for Putin and it didn't.  Also why would the West kill someone organizing anti-war marches?   Edit: To those saying the West has killed anti-war campaigners, I agree.  I meant in in the case of the Ukrainian conflict, the West is hoping that Russia will take the peaceful route and back out.
That might be an episode of Maury right there... 
1859 is a lot more reasonable. I think you identified it yourself? That's the watchmaker.   Looks like a key wind. Dial looks porcelain. 
The water isnt boiling were good
I think it's time to break up the big line and fit Poirier with Monahan somehow. Johnny and Mony just are not clicking, and Hudler's game is suffering too. It was a good experiment but I don't think it's a coincidence that Johnny hasn't scored in a month, we need to get speed up the middle for those wingers to be affective. I love Mony, my fave player in fact, but he needs a different fit, I think.
I'm shocked Hjalmarsson didn't have cracked ribs after that.
###### ^(March 2nd 2015, 16:12:42 UTC) [^(Like the bot? Tip the admins!)](/gold/payment?thing=t3_2uvxh7&amp;goldtype=gift&amp;months=1)  ### [comments: **7.00**% [removed] 7 out of 101](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;t=all&amp;amp;q=2xia6p+OR+2xhlws+OR+2xi93x+OR+2xhlse) ^(*0*)  * [+2 : 2xhlws:cp0p76p](/user/SmirG3l/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cp0p2kr&amp;amp;after=t1_cp0tgvr) by [SmirG3l](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3ASmirG3l) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+1 : 2xhlws:cp0c7ii](/user/forever_alone95/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cp0c3ux&amp;amp;after=) by [forever_alone95](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3Aforever_alone95) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+1 : 2xhlws:cp0jnk8](/user/vpnvan/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cp0jio0&amp;amp;after=) by [vpnvan](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3Avpnvan) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+3 : 2xhlws:cp0p2kr](/user/SmirG3l/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cp0oxgq&amp;amp;after=t1_cp0p76p) by [SmirG3l](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3ASmirG3l) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+4 : 2xhlws:cp0oxgq](/user/SmirG3l/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cp09t6s&amp;amp;after=t1_cp0p2kr) by [SmirG3l](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3ASmirG3l) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+1 : 2xhlws:cp0hkds](/user/anotheronedown/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_coznux3&amp;amp;after=) by [anotheronedown](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3Aanotheronedown) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)  * [+1 : 2xhlws:cp0t3xu](/user/R3DD-1T/comments?limit=1&amp;amp;before=t1_cnalgaa&amp;amp;after=) by [R3DD-1T](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AR3DD-1T) from [/r/VPN](/r/RemovedComments/search?sort=top&amp;amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;amp;q=flair%3AVPN)
There is. Whether you want to read it or not is an entirely different matter. 
I saw that poni. '3'
I wore mine a lot in the fall, when the city/university hadn't salted the sidewalks to death yet. So I actually haven't had much experience trying to wear them on the salty sidewalks.   The only wear I've noticed is that the heel has worn down just a little bit (I mean maybe 2 mm?) where I put the most pressure on them, which is on the back. Other than that, they're easy to wipe down when I get any mud on them. But I haven't had any damage done by salty - mostly because I'm afraid of damaging them.
I suppose while I'm on the subject of monitors.... Does anyone have any recommendations for a triple monitor setup.  want to spend around $150 per monitor give or take $50.
oh, i don't have delphoi :) i saw her on arena def and her team is quite hard to kill because of immunity buffs. actually acasis is good with chasun because they both will be high res% and when anyone becomes low hp chasun can use 3rd skill even if ally has unrecoverable debuff. but when i get chloe w/o hesitation i will replace acasis :) ikr, violent runes are sweet!! thanks for the feedback! 
Howdy, how are you doing?  I actually enjoy the Mindy Show as well.  Any pics of your puppy?  
You have to use the web client to do a vmotion and svmotion at the same time.  I have one a ton of them and it works great.
I was.. 16. It was last year and I lost every match. Fun times. 
Walt Jr/Flynn would be 0/0/0 ;/
Because Power Ranger/little kid logic?
Wait, 3 years?  I thought he was 2.  Fuck.
These numbers are blowing my mind. How is it possible that you can buy a unit that pays itself off after 3 years? I would take that opportunity every chance I got, but my gut tells me you're being optimistic.
&gt;worthy   Not really
Unfortunately, the SSRI is for obsessive-compulsive disorder, not depression. I'm hoping the T will help some though, and maybe eventually my dose could be lowered but I'm not going to hold my breath. Thanks though
Makes sense, I'm no stranger to a massive amount of mods myself (skyrim pushing well over 100)was just curious it all.   I ditched hdd entirely and just went ssd only, simple life is good life. 
The Emperor wishes to send assistance to the Pope in the glory of God
That was CJ Fly
You need a "home" position.  Even if the camera doesn't move, you do.  Think of it like a joystick.  Imagine if you started a game while holding "up".  When the game starts, it assumes the joystick is currently at the center position.  As a result, you can't actually move up and centering the joystick would move you down.  This is why, especially in the old days of PC gaming, you had to "calibrate" your joysticks.  A reset button isn't the most elegant solution.  But it's the beginning of a new platform and we're still getting used to our training wheels.
The Pimps? Fucking spot on.
He pointing at dank memeses.
a similar thing happened at my uni with people hanging pheasant.  
The level is not that bad as they're illustrating it to be. You'd have to be an idiot (or the director just said *fuck you* ) to trigger a witch
He got rektttt
My apologies, it was a known weaker pRNG. I've listened to that podcast when it was fresh, but thinking back to it now: it was its strength that was in question.
why is there no rope on the penis?
Nice tifo from the student section! 
Has the bad part started yet?  Doesn't seem like it.
1. RLC  2. Ake  3. Boga  4. Kalas  5. Christensen  6. Solanke  7. Baker  8. Brown
I see what you mean. I hate pretentiousness now with a burning passion, so maybe I overreacted to my own comment. I don't take myself very seriously at all anymore (not saying I'm a joke or whatever, I have a job, college, I work out.), so reading this is kind of like at the opposite end of the spectrum from where I am now. Thanks for your comment.
[This](http://i.imgur.com/2y716Kf.jpg) peasant would like to have a word with you. 
They're not the best - but I'll show them anyway.   [Click Here!](http://imgur.com/a/srB7m)
It will probably sound odd, but I love Zelalem,  I love the way he feels to control, even if his low stats make him inconsistent (especially with passes).
How would it compare to PHAT? I'm on PHAT atm, and it hits body parts 2 times a week too.
Try reading examples of other people's texts online, and see how they bring stuff up. Usually with a bit of humor and that kind of stuff.
Your comment has been automatically removed because it is probably breaking the rules. Please check the sidebar for information about what you can and can not comment and try again.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fopiaterollcall) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Not sure why you're getting downvoted, it's entirely plausible.
Believe me, I don't want KU to win either. It would just be a neat novelty. 
If they lose this...then yes. 
Remember and ice it for the swelling. No ice directly on the skin, wrap it in a washcloth or bag first. I agree not to put anything on it until it heals. 
funnily enough neither do we anymore :( they all.... vanished. promise.
Wait a few months and the price will drop.  AND they'll have all the bugs worked out.
A este tontelas cualquier dia se la cortan
I disagree with you on the weather thing. My mom was in the navy out of high school. She lived near Orlando for Boot Camp, then was stationed in Guam for 2 years. Her main gripe was the lack of seasons. Midwests have distinct seasons. Maybe it's not winter that she LOVES, but weather here isn't bad.
What're your thoughts on CA's chances in 2016? They've always seemed like a state that would go for it (right behind Colorado). 
TRP's view on who women loathe is clouded by their intense love of sounding dumber than a brick.   Edit: Also, they are almost entirely projecting because they viewed themselves as low status and thought women loathed them. In reality, it's more likely that they projected that onto the women that wouldn't date them.
No way to know what it is without a test kit. And i went and say Dada life last night too at the Masonic Temple!!! Shit was crazy
Really?! Even though he was the one that threatened me and attacked? Oh that sucks. It is not as if I got up quickly though. I was grabbing my coat.
Why is that?
If you want a modder go here  https://www.reddit.com/r/PVcommission  I dont think you can fit one of those 100/150 watt boards into a flask as they are series boards. The raptor is also a series board but its the size of a dime so its much smaller than a hana board. You can get one of those Yihi boards you want here.  http://atozvaporworld.com/products/diy-parts-kits/sx330-v3S-150-watt-diy-chip-now-in-stock-
:(
Oh, definitely.  I'm doing his romance right now and I am absolutely loving it.  
Corner by corner GPS traction control is illegal. You can't have the bike automatically change settings based on GPS coordinates(although the bike still do that, just based around other sensory information).
公式サイトに動画があった  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U55Yen3hkgE
Estas describiendo la vida en el conurbano, es así desde que tengo memoria... 
But Venezuela is a paradise, only bourgeois media is telling this country is a shithole /s
I thought the same exact thing.
I used to love drinking diet soda but now I only have one on occasion. I find that I crave diet coke when I'm actually really thirsty. It's weird. 
Here's our glorious [build list](http://reddit.com/r/pcmasterrace/wiki/builds) for PC builders! ...However, it's still recommended you consult your build with others before buying to maximize its efficiency with your wallet and needs.  Anyone on /r/PCMasterRace can [call me](http://www.reddit.com/r/PCMasterRace/wiki/calls) anytime!  ***   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpcmasterrace) if you have any questions or concerns.*
blockier and lower res textures
It's minimalist.
I've noticed that this happens with my games too. Dragon age says I have played about 20 hours longer than I really have because of instant on and resume play. 
I think capitalist in this context is really just trying to emphasize the profit motive as the major force behind the development of dangerous artificial intelligence.   Think of AI like a big heavy cinder block and it's being pushed by all these people and by far the strongest individual is Mr. Profit Motive. Sure, Mr. Academia and Mr. Government are pushing as well but Mr. Profit is so much stronger he's over doing it.  I think the fear is that as competition between different entities specializing in AI in a capitalist society ramps up, their products are going to be ever more dangerous to the point that it becomes a threat to society.
That pun is a shoe-in to get some laughs
Yes, welcome
That and because - although I can't speak for black guys - I'm guessing they're not all that torn up about it. 
Further south down in melbourne 
His argument was that he could do it because he wasn't running and therefore not a politician in the sense of needing to be reelected 
a local bee keeper told me to mix up a spray bottle 50/50 sugar water and coat your plastic foundation with it several times. The bees will lick off the sugar and *"see"* the comb shape. I was concerned when I unknowingly ordered wax dipped plastic foundation. 
To be honest, your acne isn't that bad to jump into a X-Rated Drug like Accutane. You can try the topical version of Isotretinoin, Epiduo did wonders for me and i had worse Acne than you. Meet a dermatologist and ask for it and don't fall for bullshit antibiotica
I would love that!!!!  /ping 
Ah. UHC loves fate.
&gt;So obviously staged.  Guess you don't know what obvious means, considering I didn't even know he was recording as well until I saw it on Reddit.  When someone is directly behind you, it's not really an option. Especially when he has a semi auto and we both had bolt action rifles. Made the smart play and listened.
Habs are my seocnd team!   i dont think ive seen a nucks fan that hates the Habs yet, Leafs however......
But, it seems that there are better answers than others. I want to get the best ones that I can. 
http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198074051955/  -Castle Crashers.  Me and my family don't get to talk much because of jobs and location so gaming is one of the ways we can get together. I've been thinking I could use this to play with my sister, maybe even my dad. This'll be the first multiplayer game we played, so we won't have to steal the controller from each other.  The game looks nice, interesting and the idea of those animal things following us around I find funny. I've just heard really good things about it.
You're welcome, and that makes plenty of sense, too. I hope you post more, and keep practicing! 
1730 (1940 USD) euros for the G36 variant, 2290 (2560 USD) for the OMGRAILS one.
Do you stand still and hit people, or.. I just don't..  Only on a couple of playthroughs did I ever have daedric/dragon armour, simply because fuck skills. No enchanting, smithing, alchemy and shitty speech, so I'm usually stealing armour/weapons.  I'd kill for some deadric armour - sure as hell would help. Beats dodging in.. I think it's glass right now. But I like glass armour, so I might stick with that anyway. 
Holy shit do you have a website
As it's your neighbor's router, I'd suggest you ask him/her.
MegaTen involves all of the media surrounding the franchise, so yeah! Anime's are allowed ^^^^^^^^^^^Even  ^^^^^^^^^^^though  ^^^^^^^^^^^I  ^^^^^^^^^^^dislike  ^^^^^^^^^^^that  ^^^^^^^^^^^one  ^^^^^^^^^^^specifically.  I also like your picks!
Carlson faces the same exact opposition and zone starts and his numbers are exponentially betterr.   Orpik is being hidden by John Carlson and tbh that's very smart from our coaching staff.
From one Limbohead to another, sorry to hear that.
No one said the pack was meant to be easy. That being said, there's a reason I typically only play single-player worlds on Peaceful.  Regarding Morph, the 2-blocks-tall-bat problem is actually a problem with Ars Magica, which has been fixed as of 1.4.0.0008, but that version was not available yet when version 2.0.3.0 of the pack came out. I'm sure they're planning on including that and several other fixed versions of the various mods as soon as a few key mods are updated as well.  There are also other ways to fly which don't have the risk of suffocating in the ceiling, they just take more work to get than Morph does.   Also, if there were a ton of mobs waiting for you at spawn, then the other players haven't done a good enough job at lighting the area so that doesn't happen. There are certainly plenty of light sources available to do just that, some of which have more than the standard light range, and some (very expensive to make) will actually prevent most mobs from spawning within a several block radius beyond the range of the light.  In order to transfer RF from the generator to the machines, you need either an EnderIO Energy Conduit (comes in 3 types, depending on how much you want to move at a time) or a Rednet Energy Cable (not as effective as the higher-tier EnderIO conduits, but sufficient for the lava generator). The Rednet cable is easier to make, but the basic EnderIO conduits are cheaper in the long-run.  The lack of the Thermal Expansion energy conduits (and Item and Fluiducts) is due to the TE team splitting them off into a separate mod because of some major rewrites needed to get them working in 1.7.10. If they had waited to include them in the main mod, we probably wouldn't have a 1.7.10 version of TE yet. 
How dumb is a kid that won't notice that though?
They spent all their website money on this trip. http://www.iqmetrix.com/
Black and blue?  Looks gold n white to me.
Or if they win here and lose to Bangladesh.
I think the most surprising part of this video is that there is a crowd at a Timberwolves game. Amazing.
Okay, but for so many of us (as far as "going on and on" is concerned ) owning a horse is a huge responsibility and takes up a lot of time, energy, focus, and money - it's granted to be a large part of our life. We're obviously going to talk about it a lot - it's our life. 
AA / NA potentially even though it doesn't fit in this context. 
To my understanding, the water will follow the path of least resistance, so when a lot of water is going through the top block, it will instead go through the bottom block. Results in a very minor temp increase, but looks much better (imo).
Sara Pichelli
&gt; Girls should be pushed to do better in math and science and boys in English and humanities.   you can try that, and it might work, but probably not.  &gt;  Also, each field would have to be de-stigmatized. It's hard for a woman in tech,   i rather doubt that, at least compared to being a guy in tech.  &gt; You say it's being done in Norway, but for how long?  probably 20 years. you'd expect some movement by now.
Thanks for linking me to this thread; I really appreciate it. And yes, these exact two Pokemon are among multiple Europe-exclusive events that are on my current "want list." :)
"Did you like it?" *She's munching on an apple.*
"Syrius", "she", "sleeps", "safes", "sheesh", "assassin", "Hash", "Ceðric" if he puts a lot of theatrics into his hissing, "save us", "horse", "Sissy" (bonus points if someone remembers Narcissa being called as much, say, by Bellatrix), and if he can do it without enunciating clearly, "Mahasu".  Voldemort will, of course, react nigh instantly to the likely trap.
devs balance the brown guys plz QQ
I'm in lust!
Donut run 3mg for sure! Thanks, gotta win one of these days lol
Oh ok we can do FC trade then
But she didn't die in the show.
If there ever is an apocalypse I'm going to the dentist to have these fuckers removed 
You can, but I've never done it, instead I use the Google Cards or http://theweathernetwork.com/
Occasional bias? Are you kidding me?  Western-centric narratives. Constantly.   Systematic cover-up of child porn rings in the government and their own ranks.  LONDON LONDON LONDON.
MHB RULES. Thanks !!
Man I thought the guy was a lot younger.
Ah then, it will no doubt be ruled a suicide.
ようこそ。学校で勉強しますか？学校で友達ができるといいなと思います。
They gave me like 7 older C&amp;C titles when I wanted help with Red Alert 3.
This is still very much anime.
I think the warmer tones portray the ambiance of the bar quite well. The contrasting blue/green tones to the warmer tones in the subject of the picture makes it a lovely shot. My main problem with this photo is that the subject of the shot is pretty fuzzy.
Kevin durant or dr. J
Still majestic.
Most people don't work at anything that produces 'stuff' and most stuff that is made requires highly advanced technology.  A post-apocalypse scenario bounces us back to say 1800 tech.  Most of us don't know crap about how things were back then, much less how to manufacture the necessities.  Coding skills are useless without a computer, advanced medical know-how depends on advanced diagnostic equipment and drugs.  The point is our modern society is  a system of which we are cogs, we don't know how to be cogs in another system.
I'm glad I read this before I get tied to someone (poor woman, whoever she is.) I'm not smart enough to think of something like that on my own.
Well now I feel like an ass. I apologize for my insensitive remark. 
No one cares about delivery! The message was obnoxious regardless of phrasing. If I'm justifying why I'm downvoting it (in response to the parent post that said not to downvote it because it was valid) I'm allowed to have whatever reason I want, including phrasing and message.
I'm going to need to see some verification from your superiors. All I see is a three day old account who just got trolled like a typical bitcoiner would, only not even those idiots would fall for such a weak play. You fucked up your own shit operation and I can't believe they even let you out of basic. Is this fucking amateur hour? Serious reprimandation is in order here.
can't adblock on the ps3/4 or xbone which this looks like it's one of. 
Seeing how you're waiting for 4K I'd go with waiting for the 3xx series. You're not in dire need of a GPU just yet.   I'd also recommend CFing the 3xx series.  (also, don't spend more on a monitor then gpus.)
If you're going 4k then your only real choices are   &gt;2x 290x  &gt;2x 980  &gt; Wait for the 300 series although from reports it may not be worth it to wait. Regardless, it's your choice. If you need now, buy. If you don't, don't.
Kite Runner by Khaled Hosseini. 
Dude, I simply posted an oversimplified analysis of a painting juxtaposed with Lebowski's oversimplified vaginal fixation as a joke.  But, yeah, the picture does look like a vagina.
Your link was automatically removed because you linked to reddit without using the "no-participation" np. domain. Reddit links should be of the form "np.reddit.com" or "np.redd.it"  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FShitRConservativeSays) if you have any questions or concerns.*
^honestly, ^when ^I ^eat ^out ^I ^don't ^go ^for ^healthy ^either. 
I watched American Pie with my mom when I was 14.  That would have been an NC-17 moment on this scale.
I quite like the idea of raising minimum wage and lowering CEO pay and all that. I can't remember the specifics but economic equality seems like a good idea to me
4 golds? your comment gave all of Reddit a giant erection apparently
try not jacking off for a week too
The trade off of the larger steps would be the inabilty to have precise control over your movement.  Also, there should be a new mob to drop these.  An anthropomorphic  cat that wanders around and you must catch them, similar to master thief.  It would be dressed in a foppish hat and wield a rapier of course.  It could popup anywhere, after all, it would be wearing the magic boots.  hmmm  What if there was one set of these boots in the entire game.  The only way you could keep them was to wear them?  If you were not wearing them or set them down, they would have a tendency to wander off and soon the foppish cat would be strolling the land once more.  Or perhaps the foppish cat would occasionally torment the current holder of the boots, seeking to get them back?  It would be fun to have an item like that in the game, where the holder would have to be ever viligent.  And if the holder had not logged for a suitable period of time, the item would have been lost in his sleep, in order to keep the item in constant play.
*She clings to him whenever a human passes by.*
All of those other guns are thinner and more ergonomic though.
Bet the baby-daddy is the same for both niglets.
They don't want to support a relationship that isn't going to work out. 
uh there is a bug where you change rune pages, but the change does not register. I doubt they had any way of verifying it in Bjergsen's case and just took his word for it. 
I upvoted your post. Is that ok? 
Non-mobile: [http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/State_budget_of_Norway](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/State_budget_of_Norway)  ^I'm ^a ^robot, ^and ^this ^is ^my ^purpose. ^Thank ^you ^for ^all ^the ^kind ^replies! ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble!
To be honest, while farming Caravan Low Rank Gore for Feelers, I've received 2 Plates. Only done 6 kills. So...I believe Low Rank chance is very high.
You are late to the troll, and worse at it than the last.  Sorry man.
If you want culture come to Melbourne we have heaps of hipsters that with culture you the fuck up.
agreed, but the weapon switching animations have been added already.
I'm thinking in the short-term they would secure Tal Tamr while recapturing the Assyrian villages lost to IS in the vicinity of Khabur (Tal Shamiran, Tal Nasri etc.). After that, an offensive eastwards from Kobane canton and westwards from Cizire canton to link up and capture Tal Abyad from IS.
I know, and it sucks. I'm kinda getting back into it and I'm pissed at how bland it's become. Then again, the last time I actually followed it was at the tail end of the attitude era.
Makes sense, I've always felt the HDD on my y410p has been less than spectacular.
OP, it sounds like you were being a pain in the ass.
I've seen some shit.
My wife's Aztek had them too. Good to mess with during story time in the car. 
Moord op Pim Fortuyn werd door de rechter ook niet gezien als een aanval op de democratie. Waar ligt de grens?
*3% haha
~~Especially if you swing it around like an axe~~
Saw it comming. Fine, have an upvote.
You can only buy regular stickers separately. If you want the holo/foil versions the market is a good place because these can only be obtained from lockless capsules which can be bought from the same screen in game (so you don't know which one you'll get
&gt;portions of spotted dick  I think you need to see the Doc about that. 
**SENT #16** Enjoy!
never had an issue on ps4. 
Next map season, SKDC looked not that great against ASC 2 days ago, still possible though.
Class Struggle, I had a chance to buy it years ago for like 30 bucks and thought that was too expensive, but I really want it now. :(
Sadly I'm in one of the poorest, more rural counties in my state. There are no other dietitians other than my co-worker, who is also "entry level" at this position. It's pretty much us or nothing.  I'm hoping that I can find the surgical notes for her PEG and see what Fr her tube is at. One resource I read states that tubes of 14 Fr or greater don't have too much trouble as long as a high enough watt blender is used. I figure if it's close to nectar thick and flushes properly it might be feasible. It would just involve me basically going to this person's house to train them.
50 breeders aren't a common size, I only mention it because I have one and I like the dimensions. It does have 25% more water which offers more stability in water chemistry. Since it takes up the same floor space, and isn't as ridiculously tall like the 65, it just makes more sense to me. 
Maybe they released more tickets. I just checked ticketmaster and they still have GA tickets.
I went to see Shame at the cinema with a group of friends and my Dad was over for the weekend so I invited him along. I did not know it would be like watching porn with my Dad with no escape.
Sad news. I assume he wasn't a well man. I saw him in an NBA documentary a few years back and he did *not* look healthy. 48 is tragically young for anyone, let alone a former professional athlete.
You're not just escaping, they're different people, you didn't escape from an abusive family, your family was never abusive in the first place in the new dimension, so it is a solution
'it is the same organisation who also ''certified'' the reddit Men's Rights subreddit'  They in no way certified the reddit Men's Rights subreddit as a hate group.
You have seven fingers?!
Woah! Gratz LOL. What is she runed?
Love it.
Not to sound mean or anything, but the lesson you should be learning from this is to never make plans based on rough time frames given by somebody else. I'm not sure how old you are or how much you have going on, but blacking out plans for an entire weekend to play a Beta update is a little odd. It's really best to just carry on with life and when you have a chance, you get things done.
why the fuck would you block the video in the UK? THE SHOW WAS IN THE UK
If your fan isn't making any weird noises, it is possible that part of the BIOS settings allow for the fan to slow down (or even stop) depending on the temperature. Many motherboards will actually start the system with fans running 100%, then turn them way down after just a few seconds. Try running the computer while keeping an eye on the temps, and see if the fan kicks on when it warms up. Intel has really good heat throttling, so if it gets too hot, it will slow down the processor, then shut off the computer, so no worries about damage from a broken fan. 
Not one sharknado joke. Disappointed...
Check out city ridge apartments on Arlington expressway. The website shows the floor plans. We rent a two bed two bath that's huge for 725 a month. The one bedrooms are cheaper obviously. Call them for a quote and move in specials. They are having a big push to get move ins. We've been here two years and love it. To find something at 400 or 500 you usually have to search Craig's list to find rooms for rent. Did that for 6 years and hate having room mates. I'm 5mins from downtown, about 20 from five points, 30 to the beach, 15 from the major malls and shopping. All on the bus route if you don't have a car. Jacksonville has a decent enough transportation system but its a city where you are better off with a car. Good luck.
sweet
I totally agree!  And they could bundle it with an amiibo like they're doing with Mario party 10, so those who don't have any would still be able to play,  but they could also sell it without a bundled amiibo for those of us who have the amiibos we already want(ed). 
Oh yes, but if you bother her too much she will just move somewhere else and lay down, she doesn't really use her claws or anything!
god what is going on with that place. (r/worldnews) i remember it wasnt this shitty about 2 years ago. Does stormfront and any right-wing group raid that place everyday.
Yeah, it should be between the AK and the AWP, not in the pistol category lol
lmao "changed your life for the better" oh okay bro...
Hello, you've either been sniped or buried by now, sorry. Care to redeposit?
I have a razer naga. Once you get this kind of mouse it's hard to go back to anything else. 
More like Bingo fixing, amirite?
Gungir's might is pretty bad 
they have been doing that.. its getting really annoying
Read the YouTube comments. Everyone who said its offensive is a gravy diver. 
Gave birth on my pillow. Right next to my face.
You could download CEVO and play without ranks!
Just like mum's
The bird is the word
Machine calibrations and aliquot preparation is a major variable in the testing process. I know people were shitting on Farsalinos' affiliated lab during the Diketone process because of supposed inconsistent results and such, which really sucked because they probably set us back significantly in the testing process by creating negative publicity.   I am aware of the chemical complexities of flavoring compounds and the challenges of accurately testing and producing component lists. It's definitely no easy task, but if I can gain access it would be an enjoyable experiment for me in my spare time considering my field of study. 
god dam. just to clarify 11:42 est is when it came out. all i see is 8's...
I think it outguns all the other subs and shotguns are rarely being used 30% of the time. And of course it'll get outgunned at range because every assault rifle in that game is powerful. It is still balanced though because pretty much every gun is overpowered.
You have no idea how long it takes for me and my friends to actually que up xD
Not corporate speak, I gave a example of some language that conveys the same meaning in plain English.
Is this the same shoulder he hurt a few years back? 
Gelinas...
Maybe leave it to the kid to sort out, earlish teens are terrifying?  But also, maybe, ... ask them if they feel accepted? And if they think maybe being called by the wrong name and wrong everything is really okay, or if it's making it harder to feel accepted, harder to be seen as they want to be seen?  By not doing anything, your kid is also kind of maybe letting other people know it's okay to treat someone like this, so it could hurt someone else later, too.
I'm just riffin... I dunno...
This is not the correct forum for this post. You can try r/relationships or r/lonely or even r/AdviceAnimals depending on whether you want feedback or just to vent.
http://i.imgur.com/O2IFSQe.gif
Fucking hell spoilers much.
My computer can run skyrim at high graphic and can run the forest in medium graphic.  I just don't know why this game was lagging.  EDIT: Removed two letters
